Welcome to Gutenprint 5.0.0!  Please read these release notes
carefully.

Gutenprint, formerly named Gimp-Print, is a suite of printer drivers
that may be used with most common UNIX print spooling systems,
including CUPS, lpr, LPRng, or others.  These drivers provide high
quality printing for UNIX (including Macintosh OS X 10.2, 10.3, and
10.4) and Linux systems that in many cases equal or exceed proprietary
vendor-supplied drivers in quality and functionality, and can be used
for demanding printing tasks requiring flexibility and high quality.
This software package includes an enhanced Print plug-in for the GIMP
that replaces the plug-in packaged with the GIMP, and Ghostscript and
CUPS drivers, as well as Foomatic data supporting the Ghostscript
driver.

Gutenprint has been renamed in order to clearly distinguish it from
the GIMP.  While this package started out as the original Print plugin
for the GIMP, it has expanded into a collection of general purpose
printer drivers, and the new, enhanced Print plugin for the GIMP is
now only a small part of the package.  Furthermore, the name
Gutenprint recognizes Johannes Gutenberg, the inventor of the movable
type printing press.  Finally, the word "guten" means "good" in
German.

Gutenprint 5.0.0 is the first stable release of Gutenprint 5.0, and
incorporates extensive feedback from the first release candidate.  It
is based on the Gimp-Print 4.3 series that has been in development for
over three years, and includes many improvements over the very popular
4.2 series.

Gutenprint currently supports over 700 printer models.

These release notes contain the following sections:

I)    General Requirements
II)   Changes from Previous Releases
	A) Changes from 5.0.0-rc3 to 5.0.0
	B) Changes from 5.0.0-rc2 to 5.0.0-rc3
	C) Changes from 5.0.0-rc1 to 5.0.0-rc2
III)  Overall changes from 4.2 to 5.0.
	A) General user-visible changes
	B) New Functionality
	C) Changes to the Print plugin for the GIMP
	D) Changes to the CUPS interface
	E) Changes to the Ghostscript driver
	F) Changes to the Foomatic data generator
	G) Quality improvements
	H) Architectural Changes
IV)   Exceptions and Workarounds
	A) General Issues
	B) Build/Installation Issues
V)    Supported Printers
	A) List of Supported Printers
	B) Printer-specific notes
VI)   List of supported options
	A) Basic Printer Options
	B) Advanced Printer Options
	C) Specialized Printer Options
	D) Basic Output Controls
	E) Basic Output Adjustments
	F) Advanced Output Adjustments
	G) Output Density (Ink Quantity) Controls
	H) Gray Balance Controls
	I) Output Gamma Controls
	J) Gray Generation Controls
	K) Output Linearization Curves (GIMP Plugin Only)
	L) Detailed Color Correction Curves (GIMP Plugin Only)
	M) Specialized Output Controls
	N) Transition Controls
	O) Foomatic-Only Options


================================================================

I) GENERAL REQUIREMENTS

Gutenprint will run on any reasonably modern computer running Linux,
Macintosh OS X (10.2 or above), Solaris, or any other UNIX-like
operating system.  If you plan to compile this package from source,
you will also need an ANSI C compiler, such as gcc (recommended).  A
compiler is not required if you are installing a pre-compiled package.

Processor and memory requirements vary depending upon the printer and
runtime options selected; it is suggested that you have at least 64 MB
of memory for general purpose printing, 256 MB or more for high
quality printing on a good printer, and 1 GB or more for large format
printing at high resolution.  You should have at least 50 MB of free
disk space to compile and install Gutenprint.  Disk space requirements
for printing will vary depending upon how you use Gutenprint, but are
generally modest except as noted below.  We recommend a processor
speed of at least 300 MHz.  Fast printers may require a faster
processor to achieve maximum printing speed.

For general use, you should have the Common UNIX Printing System, CUPS
(version 1.1.15 or above) or Foomatic (2.0 or above) installed.
Please the rest of the release notes, in particular the Exceptions and
Workarounds, for full details on installation, as there is important
information to be aware of.  CUPS is the printing system used on
Macintosh OS X 10.2 and above, and many other systems use it.  The
combination of CUPS and Gutenprint provides a flexible, general
purpose printing system capable of producing the highest quality
output with any of the printers supported by this package.  We
strongly recommend using CUPS with Gutenprint as a general-purpose
printing solution.

The enhanced Print plug-in for the GIMP requires either the GIMP 2.0
or above, or 1.2.3 or above on the 1.2 line (1.2.5 is recommended).
This plug-in will work with any printing system, and offers a
comprehensive user interface to control all aspects of the printing
process.  If you are printing photographs in large format from the
GIMP at very high resolution, disk space requirements may be
substantial, and we recommend at least 2 GB of free disk space for
that purpose.

The Ghostscript driver requires GNU Ghostscript 6.53 or higher, ESP
Ghostscript 7.05 or higher, or AFPL Ghostscript 7.04 or higher.  It
uses the IJS package included with these versions of Ghostscript to
create a driver that may be built much more easily than traditional
Ghostscript drivers.  This driver should be used in conjunction with
Foomatic to configure printers.

Users of Macintosh OS X 10.2 (Jaguar), 10.3 (Panther), and 10.4
(Tiger) can use this package, as the printing system is based on CUPS.
For ease of installation, a pre-built package with installer is
normally supplied a few days after the release of the source package.
We strongly recommend that OS X users use the pre-built package rather
than attempt to build it themselves.

NOTE: This package will not work with any version of OS X 10.0 and
10.1 (such as 10.1.5).  The printing system used with these versions
of OS X is not compatible with Gutenprint.  OS X 10.2 and above use
CUPS as the basis of the printing system, which is compatible with
Gutenprint.

The README file included with this package provides full instructions
for building and installing Gutenprint.


================================================================

II) MAJOR CHANGES FROM PREVIOUS RELEASES

A) MAJOR CHANGES BETWEEN GUTENPRINT 5.0.0 RELEASE CANDIDATE 3 AND
   GUTENPRINT 5.0.0:

  1) A serious problem with margins when printing from CUPS in some
     cases was introduced in Gutenprint 5.0.0-rc3.  The symptoms are
     that when printing certain kinds of material on certain printers,
     the print is positioned incorrectly on the page (too far to the
     right and too far down the page).  This problem has been fixed.

  2) The Ghostscript driver used with Foomatic now prints all pages of
     a document correctly.  Previously it did not print any page
     except the first page of a document, or printed all other pages
     with possibly incorrect settings (bug 1501816).

  3) The Postscript driver now handles PPD files with non-integer
     imageable areas correctly in all locales (the PPD files certain
     HP inkjet printers using the HPIJS driver have non-integer
     imageable areas for some paper sizes).  In 5.0.0-rc3, this was
     handled incorrectly in locales that do not use the decimal point
     (".") for separating fractions from integers.

  4) The PPD file parameter is now always accessible when using the
     Postscript driver in third party Gutenprint-enabled applications.
     This was not an issue with the enhanced Print plugin for the
     GIMP.

  5) The Epson driver now chooses unidirectional vs. bidirectional
     mode more intelligently on new printers that are capable of
     producing excellent quality in bidirectional mode at high
     resolutions.  This improves printing speed with the default
     settings in certain cases and in some cases improves print
     quality.

  6) The Epson driver offers the same quality choices as 5.0.0-rc2 for
     certain new printers such as the R800, R1800, and R2400.  Certain
     quality choices (in particular Super Photo and Ultra Photo) were
     not available in 5.0.0-rc3.

  7) Various minor problems in the PPD files have been fixed.  The
     most notable change is that the names of the option groups have
     been shortened so that they are shorter than 40 characters in all
     cases except for one case in French.

  8) The French, Danish, Hungarian, and Swedish translations have been
     updated.

  9) In the GIMP 2.4 and above (forthcoming as of Gutenprint 5.0
     release), the enhanced Print plugin will be named "Print with
     Gutenprint" so as not to collide with the GtkPrint-based plugin
     bundled with that version of the GIMP.  The Print plugin bundled
     with GIMP 2.0 and 2.2 is based on Gimp-Print 4.2; the Print
     plugin in this package simply replaces the Print plugin in those
     versions of the GIMP.

  10) Crashes in the Ghostscript and IJS drivers on certain non-Linux
     platforms have been fixed.


----------------

B) MAJOR CHANGES BETWEEN GUTENPRINT 5.0.0 RELEASE CANDIDATE 2 AND
   GUTENPRINT 5.0.0 RELEASE CANDIDATE 3:

  1) The package now offers explicit support for many more printers.
     All printers supported by Gutenprint are now listed explicitly
     rather than via the compatibility list.  As a result, CUPS PPD
     files and Foomatic are now generated for each supported printer.

  2) CUPS and Foomatic/IJS now produce correctly dimensioned and
     positioned output.  Previous pre-releases of Gutenprint 5.0
     produced incorrectly dimensioned and/or positioned (offset from
     the correct position) output in certain cases.  This happened in
     the following circumstances:

     a) When a printer capable of optional full-bleed or borderless
	operation was used in full-bleed/borderless mode, the output
	was stretched to fit the expanded dimensions.  The result was
	that lines of specified lengths were printed slightly longer
	than desired, and since the vertical and horizontal stretching
	was normally not identical, the output was distorted slightly.

     b) When printing directly to a CD, the output was shrunk
	horizontally and/or positioned incorrectly by a small amount
	(typically a few mm).

     c) Depending upon the application doing the printing and the
	printer selected, the output was shifted down and to the right
	by several mm.

     The PPD files and driver have been modified to specify zero
     borders in all cases when a printer with borderless capability is
     used.  If normal (non-borderless) mode is selected, the border is
     simply not printed, leaving correct dimensions for everything
     within the imageable area.  However, as a result of this, the
     driver no longer prints true full bleed (overprinting the edge of
     the page).  The margins are set to zero, and typically there will
     be very narrow unprinted margins (less than 1 mm) on one or more
     sides.

     Printing to CD's works correctly whether or not full bleed mode
     is selected.

     This change has no effect in the enhanced GIMP plugin and in
     other applications which directly use Gutenprint, as there was
     never any problem in those contexts.

  3) The IJS driver now correctly ejects the last page of a job.
     Previously it did not always eject the last page with certain
     Epson printers.

  4) The Epson Stylus Photo R800, R1800, R2400, and related printers
     should now print at full speed in all cases.  Previously these
     printers were extremely slow (about 10 times slower than normal)
     in many cases.

     Related to this, the list of resolutions offered for these
     printers are slightly different from before.  Resolutions above
     2880x1440 DPI are no longer offered; instead, resolutions of
     2880x1440 high quality and 2880x1440 highest quality are offered.
     These resolutions use extra passes of the print head to reduce
     banding.  In addition, these resolutions are actually 1440 DPI
     horizontally and 2880 DPI vertically.

  5) The HP DeskJet 690 and other supported PCL printers capable of
     6-color photo printing (such as the Apollo P-2100 and Apple Color
     StyleWriter 4500) no longer result in the driver crashing if
     black and white output mode was selected.  Also, Canon printers
     capable of 6 or 7 color photo printing no longer result in a
     crash if black and white output mode is selected.

  6) Canon and Lexmark inkjet printers now print if color output mode
     is selected with a black and white cartridge installed.
     Previously this was not possible in the GIMP plugin; the CUPS and
     Foomatic drivers permitted this to be set, but gave a runtime
     error when a job with these settings was printed.  These printers
     now accept the job and simply print it in black and white.

  7) The cleaning and nozzle check functions of escputil now work
     properly on most printers, and escputil no longer crashes if you
     type ctrl-D to a command prompt.  In addition, the status printed
     via the status command is now much more readable.

  8) The color quality for the Epson R300, R800, R2400, and related
     printers has been improved.

  9) Raw output now works correctly on the Epson R800 and R1800.

  10) The Canon driver now handles color and grayscale, and also photo
     ink cartridges (previously it sometimes handled these incorrectly
     or even crashed).  However, many of these printers still do not
     print correctly with a photo cartridge installed (the width of
     the printout is incorrect).

  11) The GIMP plugin now displays the thumbnail image correctly in CMY
     mode (previously it displayed incorrect colors).

  12) Experimental support for the Japan-market Epson printers PM-A900,
     PM-D800, PM-G730, and PX-V630, and preliminary support for the
     PM-A650, PM-A750, and PM-A890.

  13) The definition of the Epson Stylus CX3500, CX3600, CX3650,
     CX4100, CX4200, CX4500, CX4600, CX4700, CX4800, CX5700, CX5800,
     CX7700, CX7800, DX4200, DX4250, DX4800, and PX-A650 have been
     corrected.  The DX4800 now works correctly; the color output for
     all of these printers has been corrected.  All of these printers
     also now print at full speed; they previously printed extremely
     slowly in many cases.

     The list of resolutions is also slightly different from before;
     the 2880x1440 DPI resolution is no longer offered; instead,
     resolutions of 1440x1440 high quality and 1440x1440 highest
     quality are offered.  These resolutions use extra passes of the
     print head to reduce banding.

  14) A new option for generating simplified PPD files for CUPS has
     been added.  The --enable-simplified-cups-ppds=yes option to
     configure allows generating PPD files with only basic options
     (including only common paper sizes) in addition to the normal,
     full-featured PPD files; --enable-simplified-cups-ppds=only
     generates only the simplified PPD files.  The -a and -s options
     to cups-genppd.5.0 may be used manually to do the same thing.
     This is discussed in the README file.

  15) cups-genppdupdate.5.0 has significant enhancements:

     * A new option, -N, causes cups-genppdupdate.5.0 to not merge
       options from the old PPD file into the new file.  This can be
       used to reset a CUPS+Gutenprint PPD file to its original state.

     * A new option, -o, causes cups-genppdupdate.5.0 to output the
       PPD files into a different directory.

     * It is now possible to specify individual PPD files or printer
       queue names on the command line to only update/reset specific
       PPD files.

     * The program no longer tries and fails to update Foomatic-based
       PPD files.

  16) The Foomatic data generator now generates simplified data (using
     a driver name of "gutenprint-ijs-simplified.5.0") in addition to
     the standard, full-featured data (gutenprint-ijs.5.0).

  17) The input slots (media sources) have been corrected for the
     Epson Stylus Photo R1800, R2400, and RX700.

  18) New options to escputil allow specifying the number of line pairs
     and number of patterns for head alignment explicitly, if needed.
     In addition, the number of line pairs for the Epson Stylus Photo
     700 has been changed from 7 to 15.

  19) A few build problems have been fixed.

  20) A Hungarian translation has been added.

  21) The configure script now prints out a summary of configuration
     options selected at the end of the script run.  For developers,
     "autogen.sh --help" now prints out the configure help if the
     configure script exists.

  22) The Lexmark driver should now print correctly (this is only
     partially tested).

  23) Chilean Office, Chilean Double Letter, and Chilean Double Office
     paper sizes have been added.

  24) An error in the Czech, Danish, and Portuguese translations that
     caused the GIMP plugin to emit a warning at startup has been
     fixed.

  25) The package is now built with libtool 1.5.22.

The following bugs have been fixed since Gutenprint 5.0.0-rc3:

1318890 Borderless print scaled wrongly
1379402 BJC-4400: SEGFAULT (photo-ink/color mode)
1393755 [Feature Request] Chilean paper sizes.
1417600 escputil clean and nozzle check don't work on new printers
1417603 escputil seg faults if you type ctrl-D to prompt
1421674 Gutenprint 5.0.0rc2 crashes in Mac OS X 10.2.8
1422101 Raw output does not work on R800 and related printers
1425951 Bug#351731: Fails in alignment with stylos photo 700
1447115 Epson driver broken in RC2 (DX4850)
1458059 Lexmark Z52 not working
1458911 Very poor performance with Epson R2400, R800, and R1800
1466678 Epson Stylus Photo R300 fails to eject last page
1467956 Print to CD prints incorrectly with CUPS driver
1478819 bad translation format
1487715 HP DeskJet 690 and related crash in grayscale w/photo ink
1487717 Canon/Lexmark printers fail in color mode w/BW inks
1487720 Canon printers crash in grayscale with photo ink 

----------------

C) MAJOR CHANGES BETWEEN GUTENPRINT 5.0.0 RELEASE CANDIDATE 1 AND
   GUTENPRINT 5.0.0 RELEASE CANDIDATE 2:

  1) The Postscript driver now produces more accurate colors.
     Previous releases produced overly pale colors with the default
     settings.

  2) The Postscript driver now accepts red, green, and blue rather
     than cyan, magenta, and yellow options in the GIMP plugin.

  3) The Postscript driver now prints correctly regardless of image
     size.  Previously it corrupted the output if the width of the
     image was not a multiple of 4 pixels.

  4) The driver package now permits specifying all options regardless
     of the setting of the Image Type and Quality options (previously
     it disabled a lot of settings if Quality and/or Image Type were
     not set to Manual Control).  The behavior is now that Quality and
     Image Type provide defaults that may be overridden by the user.
     For example, if the resolution is provided explicitly, it will
     override the resolution implied by the Quality setting.

     Related to this, the CUPS driver now handles Quality properly.

  5) A description of all options supported by Gutenprint has been
     added.

  6) cups-genppdupdate now preserves the ownership and permissions of
     the PPD files being updated, rather than forcibly setting the
     owner to root and the permissions to root read/write and everyone
     else read-only access.

  7) The GIMP plugin now loads the printrc file correctly in all
     locales.  Previously it did not load floating point numbers
     correctly in locales that don't use the `.' character as the
     decimal point.

  8) The GIMP plugin now offers improved choices in the color
     adjustment window for viewing individual channels of the output.
     It now offers red/green/blue, cyan/magenta/yellow, or
     cyan/magenta/yellow/black as appropriate.

  9) The GIMP plugin is now considerably more responsive; many
     unnecessary screen redraws have been removed.  In addition, a
     display glitch wherein horizontal lines were sometimes drawn
     through certain widgets has been fixed.

  10) The Epson printer utility escputil now reports ink information
     more consistently across a wider range of printers.  In
     particular, the extended ink information command (escputil -e)
     should now work correctly on all models from the Stylus Color 740
     through the present.

  11) Preliminary support for the Epson Stylus C68, C87, C88, CX3700,
     CX3800, CX3805, CX3810, CX4100, CX4200, CX4500, CX4700, CX4800,
     CX5700, CX5800, CX7700, CX7800, D68, D88, DX3800, DX3850, DX4200,
     DX4250, DX4800, PX-A650, and Stylus Photo R220, R320, and R340.
     These printers are expected to be fully functional (for the
     multi-function devices, this package supports only the printer
     function -- it does not support scanning or fax).

  12) Preliminary support for the Epson Stylus Photo R2400/PX-5500.
     This printer has been partially tuned, but there will likely be
     further changes to this driver.

  13) Support for the Epson PictureMate/E-100.

  14) Preliminary support for the Epson Stylus Photo RX700/PM-A900.
     This printer has been partially tuned, but there will likely be
     further changes to this driver.

  15) Initial support for Canon S200, SELPHY CP-510 and SELPHY CP-710;
     Sony UP-DR150, and Olympus P-11 has been added.

  16) The Canon PIXMA iP4000 printers can now print to cds.  Duplex
     printing with binding on the short side is now supported, too.

  17) The Epson Stylus Photo R200 and related printers have been
     retuned to give improved detail in the shadows, reduced ink
     usage, more accurate grayscale, and more accurate colors.
     Affected printers are presently the R200, R210, R220, R300, R310,
     R320, R340, RX400, RX420, RX425, RX430, RX500, RX510, RX600,
     RX620, RX630, PM-D750, PM-D770, PM-G700, and PM-G720.

     Any profiles generated against these printers will have to be
     re-created.

  18) The Epson Stylus Photo R800 and R1800 have been retuned to give
     improved detail in the shadows, reduced ink usage, more accurate
     grayscale, and more accurate colors.

     Any profiles generated against these printers will have to be
     re-created.

  19) New "transposed" resolutions (1440x720 and 2880x1440) have been
     added for some Epson printers.  These resolutions are actually
     equivalent to 720x1440 and 1440x2880 DPI respectively.  In some
     cases these may yield better results (specifically, less
     microbanding) than the normal 1440x720 and 2880x1440 DPI
     resolutions.

  20) Quadtone printing now works correctly regardless of whether
     color or grayscale mode is selected.

The following bugs have been fixed in Gutenprint 5.0.0-rc2:

1389788 Poor discoverability of advanced options
1389787 CUPS driver does not set Quality correctly
1389785 cups-genppdupdate sets PPD file owners incorrectly
1388615 escputil with Epson CX3700
1304710 Postscript driver corrupts output if width not multiple of 4
1251978 PPD for Stylus Color 600


================================================================

III) OVERALL CHANGES BETWEEN GIMP-PRINT 4.2 AND GUTENPRINT 5.0:

A) GENERAL USER-VISIBLE CHANGES:

  1) Gutenprint offers many new options, which are described
     separately below.  Many other options that are present in both
     4.2 and 5.0 function differently between the two releases.

  2) Options in the CUPS driver and GIMP plugin are now grouped
     according to function.  This work is still in progress, and
     we expect to make further usability improvements.

  3) Simplified bundles of settings are now offered for users who do
     not need to customize the settings.  The Print Quality and Image
     Type controls offer a variety of settings optimized for common
     printing tasks; these settings may be overridden by explicit user
     choice.

  4) Many of the color settings have changed effect.  We recommend
     starting with no color adjustments and making appropriate changes
     only as required.  Specific changes that you should be aware of
     include:

     * The default operation of the contrast setting has changed to be
       more in accord with other packages.  In 4.2, reducing the
       contrast resulted in changing the black and white setting.  In
       5.0, reducing the contrast does not change the black and white
       settings.  As a result, it is possible to use the contrast
       setting to improve highlight and shadow detail by reducing the
       contrast.

       The previous behavior is available by turning on the "Linear
       Contrast Adjustment" setting.

     * The brightness control now behaves more in accord with standard
       practice, adjusting the image's overall brightness without
       changing the black or white points.

     * The Cyan, Magenta, and Yellow settings have been replaced with
       separate settings for gamma, density, and gray balance for
       Cyan, Magenta, Yellow, and Black.  The Cyan, Magenta, and
       Yellow settings in Gimp-Print 4.2 most closely correspond to
       the gamma settings in 5.0.

       The per-channel density settings do not affect the color
       correction.  They are applied after the color correction to
       scale the individual channels.  The per-channel gray balance
       settings adjust gray balance without affecting per-channel
       density settings (i. e. the adjust the amount of ink used to
       generate gray), permitting increased color saturation without
       compromising gray balance.

  5) The Uncorrected color correction mode is recommended for users
     who wish to use their own color (ICC or otherwise) profiles with
     Gutenprint drivers.  This will yield the maximum gamut and most
     uniform response.  If you are not using your own color
     management, you will generally get best results from the High
     Accuracy color correction setting.  Users who wish to perform
     their own linearization and ink limiting may wish to use the Raw
     color correction mode, which does not adjust the density.

     Any profiles generated against Gimp-Print 4.2 are unlikely to
     produce good results with Gutenprint 5.0.  The color generation
     is sufficiently different that you will need to create new
     profiles against Gutenprint 5.0.  In general, color adjustment
     should not change between Gutenprint 5.0 releases starting with
     release 5.0.0.  Color adjustments may change during beta
     (5.0.0-beta) and release candidate (5.0.0-rc) phases.

  6) The old man pages, and src/ghost/README, have been withdrawn.
     These pages, and the Ghostscript README file, were based on the
     Gimp-Print 4.2 options, which were much less extensive than the
     current option system.  It is not practical to keep them up to
     date in any meaningful way.  Our recommendation is that people
     use either the native CUPS driver or Foomatic to manage options
     rather than attempt to create and manage printer queues by hand.

  7) The source browser in the documentation package has been removed.
     This information, which consists of color-coded annotation of the
     source code, is of little interest to the vast majority of users
     and consumes a significant amount of space in the installation.


----------------

B) NEW FUNCTIONALITY:

  1) This release offers a new "curve" data type, permitting very
     precise adjustments of output.  Currently the curves are only
     accessible in the GIMP plugin.

  2) This release offers many new output controls:

     + Balance (density) controls for each color channel, in addition
       to the gamma controls present in 4.2.

     + Gray balance controls for the cyan, magenta, and yellow
       channels.  These controls allow fine tuning of gray tones
       without affecting color.

     + Black (GCR) transition, including the transition gamma and the
       upper and lower limits.

     + Transitions for photo (light cyan, light magenta, and gray)
       inks.

     + Transfer curves for each channel (cyan, magenta, yellow, black,
       and composite), allowing very precise control over the output.

     + Transfer curves for generation of additional channels where
       applicable, such as red and blue inks for the Epson Stylus
       Photo R800 and R1800.

     + Hue, saturation, and luminosity transfer curves permit tuning
       of the color corrections utilized by Gutenprint.

     + Ink limit control.

     + The density control now permits setting density as high as 8.0,
       vs. 2.0 in 4.2.

  3) The Epson driver offers (almost) true full bleed for printers
     that support it (but see the limitations below).

  4) The PCL driver now offers duplex (two sided) printing support on
     appropriate printers.

  5) The package now includes support for a number of dye sublimation
     photo printers made by Olympus, Canon, Sony, and Fujifilm.

  6) The resolution list for Epson printers has been simplified; many
     redundant resolutions have been removed.

  7) Print head direction for Epson printers (unidirectional
     vs. bidirectional) is now a separate control.  In addition to
     contributing to the simplification of the Epson printer
     resolutions, this permits the choice of unidirectional
     vs. bidirectional at all resolutions if desired.  By default, the
     driver picks the most appropriate choice for the situation.

  8) The Epson driver now allows printing directly to CD's on printers
     that support this functionality.  In addition, a choice of center
     hole size (16 mm or 43 mm) is now offered.  A fine adjustment is
     provided to permit control over positioning of the image on the
     CD.  This fine adjustment setting is not available in the
     Foomatic interface at present.

     To print to a CD, you need to select the "Print to CD" media
     source (input slot).  You must also select the appropriate page
     size (3" CD or 5" CD).  Note that this is different from the
     instructions Epson provides, which specify A4 media size.

  9) The Epson driver now offers a choice of print head weave
     patterns.  In addition to simplifying the resolution choices for
     Epson Stylus Pro printers, this offers an additional control for
     fine tuning output quality.

  10) The Epson driver offers an Ink Set control for printers taking
     different choices of inks (such as the Epson Stylus Photo 2200,
     which offers a choice of Matte Black and Photo Black inks).

  11) Where practical, all controls offer a default setting for
     simplicity of operation.  This default value is intended to offer
     the optimal choice given the printer and its other settings.  For
     example, if "Automatic" is selected for print head direction, the
     print head motion will be unidirectional at high resolutions
     (since unidirectional usually produces better output), but
     bidirectional at low resolutions (for faster printing).

     The default is only offered for options that are not directly
     controlled by the user's action.  For example, there is no
     default choice offered for paper type, since the correct value is
     based on the paper type loaded by the user.  Similarly, there is
     no default for the input slot or ink set.

  12) Support for a variety of input types, in both 8 and 16 bit
     resolution, has been added.  Gutenprint can now handle input in
     grayscale, whitescale (inverted grayscale), RGB, CMY, CMYK, and
     KCMY in 8 and 16 bit resolutions for all output types.

  13) A new Threshold color correction mode has been added that
     produces either all-on or all-off of each color.  This is similar
     to the Monochrome mode in 4.2, except that it works for color as
     well as black.

  14) A new Desaturated color correction mode has been added that
     produces gray (desaturated) output using color inks.

  15) A new Density color correction mode has been added that corrects
     only for density.  This will normally produce excessively dark
     output.  However, applications that wish to use their own
     linearization curves may wish to use this interface to prevent
     Gutenprint from performing its own linearization.

  16) A new Raw color correction mode has been added that performs no
     correction whatsoever on the input.  This mode may be used by
     applications that wish to perform their own ink limiting and
     linearization, and use Gutenprint to perform dithering
     (screening) and output generation only.

  17) A new Predithered color correction mode has been added that
     combines the effects of Raw and Threshold.  This mode may be used
     by applications that wish to perform their own dithering and use
     Gutenprint to generate printer-specific output only.  The input
     value should be the size of the drop desired (for single-level
     printers, it should be 0 or 1; for printers with three drop
     sizes, it should be 0, 1, 2, or 3).

  18) A new Correct Hue Only color correction mode has been added that
     performs partial color correction (adjusts hue, but not
     darkness).

  19) The escputil command, which performs various printer
     administration activities on Epson Stylus printers, has a number
     of improvements:

     * A new extended ink information command has been added.  This
       command, which is supported on printers with separate
       individual ink cartridges, prints additional information about
       the ink cartridge in addition to the amount of ink present.  On
       older printers, it simply returns the standard ink
       information.

     * The status command now prints status in a human-readable format
       rather than simply reporting the raw information returned by
       the printer.

     * Ink level detection now works on all known supported printers,
       and may work on other non-supported printers.  Previously it
       did not work on some newer printers.  However, it is somewhat
       slower on these printers than it is on older printers that
       support the faster ink detection method.

     * Ink level detection now prints the correct ink color names for
       the printer model.

     * It is now no longer necessary to use the -u flag with certain
       printers in most cases.  The utility now autodetects the
       printer model and generates appropriate commands in all cases.

       If you supply a printer queue (with the -P option) rather than
       a raw device (with the -r option), you will still need to
       provide the -u flag, as the utility cannot detect the actual
       printer connected to a queue.  However, commands that must be
       run bidirectionally (ink level, identify, and printer status)
       do not require the -u flag any more.

     * escputil now successfully detects ink level, printer model, and
       status even if the printer is out of ink.

  20) The Epson driver permits adjusting the dot size if required to
     increase the amount of ink printed.  For example, if 1440x720 DPI
     is selected, but the density requested is very high, the printer
     will switch to using drop sizes appropriate for 720 DPI.  This
     option is not normally required and is disabled by default.


----------------

C) CHANGES TO THE ENHANCED PRINT PLUGIN FOR THE GIMP:

  1) A new plugin for the GIMP 2.x, enhanced with all new Gutenprint
     5.0 functionality, is now provided.

  2) The Print plugin for the GIMP 1.2 is now deprecated and will be
     withdrawn in 5.1 (the development release following 5.0).  The
     Print plugin for the GIMP 1.2 will continue to be supported with
     critical bug fixes in all 5.0 releases, but no new functionality
     will be added, or non-critical bugs fixed, following the release
     of 5.0.0.

  3) The plugin now always displays the page preview with the top of
     the page at the top of the preview pane, rotating the image
     preview as necessary to display landscape or portrait mode.

  4) The positioning controls have been simplified.

  5) The printrc file format is different.  Gutenprint 5.0 can read
     printrc files created by Gimp-Print 4.2 and earlier, but it
     writes out the printrc file in a format that earlier versions of
     Gimp-Print cannot read.

  6) Printer queue discovery and command specification are greatly
     simplified over 4.2.  The plugin now offers a default printing
     command that is determined based on the characteristics of the
     system, and also offers the choice of printing to a file or using
     a custom print command for each printer defined in the printrc
     file.  The default printing command is correct whether the output
     is Postscript or not; it is no longer necessary to remove "-oraw"
     from the print command line.

  7) The Print plugin now always displays all options relevant to
     what's being printed, enabling and disabling options as
     appropriate.

  8) The plugin now lists printers grouped by manufacturer, rather
     than a single long list.

  9) If you are using an older version of the GIMP 1.2, and the GIMP
     is installed in a non-standard location on your system such that
     you cannot run configure in Gutenprint without using
     --with-gimp-prefix or --with-gimp-exec-prefix, please read item
     (8) in Exceptions and Workarounds below.  In addition, if you
     have both the GIMP 1.3/2.0 and the GIMP 1.2 installed on your
     system, you should read the same material.


----------------

D) CHANGES TO THE CUPS INTERFACE:

  1) The CUPS PPD files now offer both fine and coarse adjustments for
     all color controls, permitting much finer control over output (in
     steps of .005 rather than .05) without making the menus unwieldly.

  2) The CUPS driver refuses to function with PPD files created for a
     different version of Gutenprint or Gimp-Print, providing an error
     message indicating the problem.  This avoids problems caused by
     mismatches between the PPD files and the driver.  While
     mismatches are potentially not harmful in all cases, they could
     cause problems ranging from failures to print with poor
     diagnostic messages to incorrect results.

  3) The Gutenprint 5.0 CUPS driver can be installed concurrently with
     the 4.2 driver.  Both the PPD files and the driver carry
     different names from their 4.2 counterparts, permitting a
     parallel installation or gradual switchover between 4.2 and
     5.0-based releases.

  4) An update script (cups-genppdupdate.5.0) is provided to update
     PPD files between later 4.3 and 5.0-based releases, preserving
     option values where possible.  This script will not update PPD
     files based on Gimp-Print 4.2, or Gimp-Print 4.3 releases prior
     to 4.3.21.

  5) On printers capable of borderless output, the CUPS driver now
     advertises (via the *ImageableArea in PPD files) the full page
     dimension, and crops the output if the borderless mode is not
     selected.  If borderless mode is selected, the full image (up to
     the limits of the printer) will be printed.

     This compromise is necessitated by the fact that PPD files can
     only supply a single imageable area for a particular page size,
     so it was necessary to select which imageable area to provide.
     In early prereleases of Gutenprint 5.0, we supplied the normal
     page area, and stretched the output if the user selected full
     bleed.  This caused problems for many users, in that it was not
     possible to print the full surface of the paper while preserving
     dimensions.

     Based on user feedback, we determined that the best solution is
     to provide the full page size as the imageable area and crop the
     result if full bleed mode is not selected.

  6) The CUPS driver now offers 16-bit printing as an option with ESP
     Ghostscript 8.15, and Apple Macintosh OS X 10.4 ("Tiger"), using
     the new Color Precision control.  Setting Color Precision to
     "Best" enables 16-bit printing if the system supports it; setting
     it to "Normal" uses 8-bit printing.  Setting Color Precision to
     "Best" has no effect if the version of CUPS does not support
     16-bit printing; in that case, "Best" is still 8-bit.

     The higher precision may improve results with certain source
     material, particularly if it contains smooth color gradients.
     The result would be freedom from banding, particularly in
     highlights where it might be visible with 8-bit color
     computation.  It may be somewhat slower than 8-bit printing.

  7) Due to the implementation of CUPS, it is necessary on some
     systems to link the programs associated with the CUPS driver (in
     particular, cups-genppd and rastertogutenprint) statically
     against the Gutenprint library.  Please see bugs 865253 and
     865265 for full details.

     This fix works correctly unless --disable-static (to disable
     building static libraries) is passed on the command line.
     Normally, only people packaging up Gutenprint for distribution
     use this option.  If you wish to use this option, please read
     item (6) in Exceptions and Workarounds *carefully* for a full
     description of the problem along with suggested methods of
     procedure.


----------------

E) CHANGES TO THE GHOSTSCRIPT DRIVER:

  1) The stp driver, a monolithic (traditional) Ghostscript driver
     used with Ghostscript 5.10, 5.50, and 6.51, has been withdrawn.
     The only supported Ghostscript driver is the IJS-based driver,
     for GNU Ghostscript 6.53 and above, ESP Ghostscript 7.05 and
     above, and AFPL Ghostscript 7.04 and above.

     This change was made due to the difficulty of supporting the
     monolithic driver and the complexity of building it.  The
     traditional monolithic driver architecture required that all
     drivers be compiled into Ghostscript, requiring that program to
     be recompiled whenever a driver is added.  This is a rather
     complicated operation that cannot easily be automated.  The IJS
     architecture, based on the open source HPIJS driver supplied by
     Hewlett-Packard for HP inkjet printers, allows for drivers to be
     compiled independently of the core Ghostscript.  A
     Gimp-Print/Gutenprint driver based on the IJS architecture was
     introduced into Gimp-Print 4.2.1 and 4.3.0, and has been
     recommended for use with Gimp-Print 4.2.2 and beyond.

     In addition to a greatly simplified build procedure and overall
     cleaner architecture, the separation between Ghostscript and
     driver imposed by the IJS architecture permits use of Gutenprint
     with AFPL Ghostscript with no license conflict.


----------------

F) CHANGES TO FOOMATIC DATA GENERATION:

  1) The Ghostscript IJS driver now functions only with Foomatic PPD
     files created for the matching version of Gutenprint, providing
     an error message indicating the problem if an incorrect PPD file
     is used.  This avoids problems caused by mismatches between the
     PPD files and the driver.  While mismatches are not harmful in
     all cases, they could cause problems ranging from failures to
     print with poor diagnostic messages to incorrect results.

  2) The Gutenprint 5.0 Foomatic data and IJS driver can be installed
     concurrently with the 4.2 driver.  Both the PPD files and the
     driver carry different names from their 4.2 counterparts,
     permitting a parallel installation or gradual switchover between
     4.2 and 5.0-based releases.

  3) On printers capable of borderless output, the Foomatic driver now
     advertises (via the *ImageableArea in PPD files) the full page
     dimension, and crops the output if the borderless mode is not
     selected.  If borderless mode is selected, the full image (up to
     the limits of the printer) will be printed.

     This compromise is necessitated by the fact that PPD files can
     only supply a single imageable area for a particular page size,
     so it was necessary to select which imageable area to provide.
     In early prereleases of Gutenprint 5.0, we supplied the normal
     page area, and stretched the output if the user selected full
     bleed.  This caused problems for many users, in that it was not
     possible to print the full surface of the paper while preserving
     dimensions.

     Based on user feedback, we determined that the best solution is
     to provide the full page size as the imageable area and crop the
     result if full bleed mode is not selected.


----------------

G) QUALITY IMPROVEMENTS:

  1) Color and tonal accuracy is greatly improved compared to 4.2
     while the gamut (range of printable colors) has been increased.
     This particularly improves the hue accuracy of red, magenta, and
     blue, and the tonal accuracy of cyan and green.  Most Epson
     printers have been fully tuned for the new color correction
     algorithms introduced for this release.

     The default gamma has been changed to produce lighter midtones
     with all Epson printers.

  2) The handling of variable drop sizes and photo inks (6 and 7 color
     printers) has been completely revised, with the result being that
     variable drop size printers with photo inks (such as most Epson
     Stylus Photo and Stylus Pro printers) give much more consistent
     results with fewer artifacts.  In particular, colors match
     correctly across all resolutions, which was not the case in 4.2.

     In 4.2, variable size drops and light inks were treated the same
     way; an "effective drop size" based on the relative size of the
     drops and the darkness of the inks was used to decide what kind
     of drop to print.  While this method has some advantages (it
     ensures that dark and light inks are never printed at the same
     place, and also that dark dots are optimally dispersed among
     light dots), it has some serious disadvantages as well: the
     properties of a small dark dot and a large light dot are not
     really the same, particularly when inks are mixed.  The
     combination of different drop sizes being used at different
     resolutions meant that the transition between light and dark inks
     differed depending upon the resolution chosen, and if more than
     one drop size was required at a given resolution, the transition
     tended to be quite marked.

     The new method of handling variable size drops and light inks is
     to first separate each of the four channels (cyan, magenta,
     yellow, and black) into the appropriate light and dark inks, if
     needed.  This separation is performed based on the relative
     darkness of the different ink sub-colors (such as light and dark
     cyan) and specific characteristics of the printer, ink type, and
     paper chosen.  Following this, each sub-color is screened
     separately, and the appropriate combination of drop sizes is
     chosen.

     The drop size selection in this release has also been changed to
     fill the page with as many small drops as possible before
     switching to larger drops.  This ensures that the largest number
     of the smallest possible drops is printed, which yields a
     smoother texture in the midtones.

     Finally, new dither algorithms described below allow drops of ink
     of different colors to be dispersed, avoiding clumping or
     overprinting of drops.

  3) The EvenTone dither algorithm has been extensively reworked in
     this release, offering many improvements.

     First, it has been rewritten to work correctly with variable drop
     size and photo printers.  This algorithm, which offers
     significant improvements over the standard Adaptive Hybrid
     algorithm, does not work optimally with variable drop sizes or
     photo printers in 4.2.

     Secondly, a variation called Hybrid EvenTone has been added.
     This dither algorithm perturbs the dot positions slightly to
     break up some patterning seen in standard EvenTone dithering in
     solid regions of pale tones, particularly when printing with
     black ink only.  This very slightly reduces the smoothness of
     texture in exchange for largely eliminating this undesirable
     patterning.  This algorithm is also expected to be more resistant
     to microbanding effects.

  4) The conversion between black and composite (CMY) gray has been
     improved in this release, yielding more neutral grays on most
     printers.

  5) Epson printers have been completely retuned, in most cases
     yielding much better density, more accurate gray scale, and
     darker black on all paper types.


----------------

H) ARCHITECTURAL CHANGES:

  1) Family drivers are now modular.  A "family driver" is a
     collection of printer drivers for one group of printers sharing a
     common programming architecture, e. g. ESC/P2, PCL, Lexmark,
     Canon.  The drivers can be built as separate modules and loaded
     at runtime as needed.

  2) Color processing is now partially modularized.  This architecture
     will enable us, or others, to provide color management without
     having to change the internal interfaces within Gutenprint.

  3) New composite data types.  Gutenprint 5.0 defines additional data
     types.  These types include:

     * Sequences, curves, and arrays.  A sequence is a primitive
       vector of numbers data type; curves and arrays provide
       additional capabilities such as interpolation (for curves) and
       multiple dimensions (for arrays).

     * Lists are a general ordered container of named objects of
       arbitrary type.  They are used throughout the core library in a
       variety of ways.  The creator of a list can specify
       constructor, destructor, name comparison, copy, and sort
       operations on list members.

     * Parameters, which are part of the options system described
       below.  In addition to storing values and descriptions of the
       parameter, parameters can be queried to determine defaults and
       constraints.  Parameter lists (which use the list container
       internally) are also defined as part of this.

     * String lists are used in various ways; in particular, they are
       used by the parameter system to inform programs of the
       available choices of values for string-valued parameters.

  4) Complete overhaul of the options system.  Rather than offering a
     fixed set of operations, family drivers, color modules, etc. can
     now offer a wide variety of options using a predefined set of
     data types.  The data types currently supported are strings
     picked from a list, floating point numbers, integers, curves,
     arrays, Boolean values, dimensions, and filenames.

     The new options system provides a flexible way for drivers to
     inform applications of default values and UI hints, the ability
     to selectively enable and disable options, and a generalized way
     of verifying legality of option choices.

  5) The coordinate system has been changed from bottom left to top
     left of the page, and the printable area can now extend beyond
     the edge of the page.  The result is a more intuitive coordinate
     system for driver writers that matches the coordinate system of
     printers, and the ability to do true full bleed.

  6) The specification of color correction, input, and output modes
     has been completely revised, permitting applications to specify
     input mode, output mode, channel bit depth, and color correction
     completely independently.  This architecture is also more
     extensible.

  7) Complete overhaul of the black generation in CMYK output.  Black
     generation is now performed in the color code rather than the
     dither code.  This simplifies the dither code, puts the CMYK
     generation where it should be, and improves overall flexibility.

  8) Complete overhaul of the multi-tone (photo or quadtone) ink
     processing architecture (channels).  Instead of being processed
     as part of the dithering code as in 4.2, where ink drops of
     lighter inks were assigned virtual values proportional to their
     darkness as well as their size, this is now processed after the
     initial color conversion.  This has a number of major advantages:

     * As the actual amount of ink to be printed is visible to the
       color code, the color code can do ink limiting without fear
       that the dither code will change the amount of ink to be
       printed.

     * It ensures that the same proportions of inks will be printed at
       any density and resolution.  In 4.2, the ramp from light to
       dark ink varied depending upon the dot sizes available and
       hence the resolution.  This has already been demonstrated to
       yield much better linearity and much more neutral gray scale
       with even very modest tuning effort.

     * It enables use of all drop sizes of all ink tones.  In 4.2, we
       could not use the smallest drop size of dark ink, because the
       virtual dot size of a small dot of dark ink is typically close
       to the virtual dot size of a large dot of small ink.  This
       would yield very sharp transition, and perhaps even result in
       more light ink printed in darker regions than in lighter
       regions.  With channel processing separate from dithering, this
       concern no longer exists; we can safely use small drops of dark
       ink, improving smoothness.

     * It enables the color code to do ink limiting intelligently
       without concern that the dither code will rearrange things
       behind its back.

     * It greatly simplifies the specification of inks.  With drop
       size and darkness orthogonal, family drivers can greatly
       simplify their tables of inks.

     * Dither algorithms can choose to ignore smaller drop sizes if
       they wish to offer fast operation.

     * Applications with special requirements can now access the raw
       ink channels directly.  This facility was used to create a
       mechanism to more accurately tune printer inks.

  9) The color system can now generate arbitrary ink colors, lifting
     the CMYK-only restriction in previous versions of the package.
     This permits full support for the Epson Stylus Photo R800 and
     R1800, which use red and blue ink in addition to the traditional
     CMYK.

  10) Use of true XML to store data about printers and paper sizes, and
     to represent new data types (sequences, curves, and arrays).
     This uses the "mxml" XML library, a fast, lightweight XML parser
     written by Mike Sweet for this project.  Currently, the use of
     XML (as opposed to compiled-in data) is limited, but we expect
     that this will change beyond the initial 5.0 release.

  11) In addition to parameters, internal components such as family
     drivers, color drivers, etc. can store arbitrary data in the
     basic stp_vars_t object.  This facility is used to simplify the
     internal driver API; the family driver no longer needs to keep
     track of dither, color, etc. information itself.

  12) The Epson Stylus family driver has been decomposed into more
     functionally distinct units.  The data schema has been
     considerably improved, and the code itself broken into more
     easily maintained units.

  13) The build system has been updated with a more contemporary
     toolchain based on autoconf 2.5 and gettext 0.11.

  14) The Print plugin for the GIMP has been decomposed into a UI
     library and the core plugin.  The user interface library is a
     pure GTK-based library; the tiny GIMP plugin is a client of this
     library.

  15) Printer characteristics are exposed to the application level as
     read-only parameters.  This permits the escputil utility to not
     duplicate information stored in the printer driver.


================================================================

IV) EXCEPTIONS AND WORKAROUNDS

A) GENERAL ISSUES

  1) Full bleed mode does not work completely correctly on most Epson
     printers at present.  Typically there is a small margin at the
     bottom of the page (1-2 mm) and possibly a very small margin at
     the top.  However, it works correctly along the left and right
     margins.  We do not have an estimated time for a fix.

  2) The Canon, Hewlett-Packard, and Lexmark drivers do not offer all
     of the additional options and improvements that the Epson driver
     does.  We do not have an estimated time for fix.  Please contact
     us if you would like to assist with this.

  3) Support for the Canon S200 has not yet been ported forward from
     4.2.

  4) This release is slower than 4.2 in many cases, particularly when
     using High Accuracy (which is the default color correction in
     most cases) or Bright color correction.  It is possible that this
     release will not be able to drive some printers at full speed,
     particularly if your computer has a slow processor.  Performance
     has been only partially analyzed or tuned at present.

  5) The user's manual and developer's guide have not been updated for
     this release.


----------------

B) BUILD/INSTALLATION ISSUES

  1) With certain versions of CUPS and in certain non-default
     configurations, if a new version of Gutenprint is installed over
     an existing version genppd will create PPD files based on the
     older version of Gutenprint rather than the newer version.  This
     will happen if all of the following are true:

     i) The cups-config provided by the CUPS driver adds
        -Wl,rpath=/usr/lib. This is done by some versions of CUPS
        reportedly because in some cases the runtime linker does not
        pick up libraries out of /usr/lib.  This can be checked by
        running

        cups-config --libs --ldflags

        and inspecting the output for any mention of "rpath", "RPATH",
        "RUN_PATH", or the like.  This is controlled by the CUPS
        installation on your system.

     ii) There is presently a version of Gutenprint installed in /usr
        (--prefix=/usr) rather than /usr/local or the like.  The
        default location of Gutenprint installation is in /usr/local,
        but system vendors typically install Gutenprint in /usr.

     iii) Gutenprint is built dynamically only (--disable-static or
        --disable-static-genppd).  This is not a default, and requires
        the explicit --disable-static or --disable-static-genppd on
	the Gutenprint "configure" command line.  Therefore, if you
	build Gutenprint normally you should not be vulnerable to this
	problem.

     Note that in general if you install CUPS into a non-standard
     location, and install Gutenprint into the same location, this
     problem can surface.  For example, if you choose to install CUPS
     in /usr/local and Gutenprint in /usr/local you are vulnerable to
     this.  However, it is not standard practice to install CUPS
     anywhere but /usr.

     In this case, the run path embedded in the genppd executable
     points to the version of Gutenprint installed in /usr/lib.  This
     run path overrides any attempt by libtool to look in the build
     directory.  The result is that cups-genppd and rastertogutenprint
     are run against the older version of Gutenprint.  If the new
     version contains additional features (more printers, changes to
     printer options, etc.) they will not be available.

     This bug is difficult to detect in a normal build.  It normally
     does not cause an error to happen during build unless there is an
     API change from the version installed and the version being
     built; the only failure is frequently that some PPD files may not
     be built or may be built with missing options.  Due to the PPD
     version checking introduced in this release, the behavior might
     manifest itself as a runtime error.  It is also possible that
     there will be no error at all other than the older version of
     Gutenprint being used, with the result that new features and bug
     fixes are not available.

     If you wish to use only shared libraries, do not wish to build
     static libraries at all, and are vulnerable to this issue
     (because cups-config --ldflags sets the run path), there are
     three workarounds available:

     i) Build and install Gutenprint into /usr (rather than
        /usr/local) and then rebuild Gutenprint from scratch.  This
        will install the correct libgutenprint.so in /usr/lib, and in
        the rebuild genppd will be run against the correct library.

     ii) Remove the old version of Gutenprint prior to building the
        new version of Gutenprint.  The important files to remove are
        anything named /usr/lib/libgutenprint*.

     iii) Edit cups-config to remove the reference to the run path.

  2) There is a known translation problem building the PPD files used
     by the CUPS driver such that on many systems all of the PPD
     files are in the English language.  This causes CUPS tools, such
     as KUPS or http://localhost:631 to display many copies of each
     PPD file, all in the English (en) language.  In fact, the PPD
     files should be translated into many different languages.

     The PPD files are created by a program named "genppd" in the
     src/cups directory.  This program is called once for each
     language, and creates all of the PPD files for the language in
     one shot.

     The command 'zgrep' can be used to determine if genppd is
     creating the PPD files correctly, as follows:

	 src/cups$ zgrep LanguageVersion ppd/*/pcl-4.ppd.gz
	 ppd/C/pcl-4.ppd.gz:*LanguageVersion: English
	 ppd/da/pcl-4.ppd.gz:*LanguageVersion: Danish
	 ppd/en_GB/pcl-4.ppd.gz:*LanguageVersion: English-GB
	 ...

     If the PPD file for each language has a different language
     version, the genppd program operated correctly.  If instead the
     output looks like this:

	 src/cups$ zgrep LanguageVersion ppd/*/stp-pcl-4.5.0.ppd.gz
	 ppd/C/stp-pcl-4.5.0.ppd.gz:*LanguageVersion: English
	 ppd/da/stp-pcl-4.5.0.ppd.gz:*LanguageVersion: English
	 ppd/en_GB/stp-pcl-4.5.0.ppd.gz:*LanguageVersion: English
	 ...

     the program did not operate correctly.

     If you do not have 'zgrep' on your system, you can gunzip the
     PPD files, and use

	 grep LanguageVersion ppd/*/stp-pcl-4.5.0.ppd

     to accomplish the same test.

     The normal mechanism for performing translations is to set the
     LANG environment variable to the appropriate language prior to
     running the program.  This normally causes the program to search
     the translations (normally in /usr/share/locale or
     /usr/lib/locale) for the chosen language.  When a specially
     marked string is used, a special macro calls `gettext()' on the
     string to retrieve the translation, and substitutes the
     translation for the string in question.

     There are two problems with this approach in the context of
     genppd.  The translation engine is intended to be used after
     installation, not during build, and this causes problems.

     i) At the time genppd is run, the translations have not been
	installed in the normal system directories.  Fortunately,
	it's possible to tell the translation machinery (via
	bindtextdomain) to look elsewhere for the translation
	catalogs.  What we do is install the catalogs in a temporary
	directory under src/cups, and tell genppd to instruct the
	translation machinery to look there.  This workaround is
	straightforward, and doesn't normally cause problems.

     ii) LANG only lets us pick a valid locale (normally determined by
	listing the directories in /usr/share/locale or
	/usr/lib/locale).  Unfortunately, while language codes (which
	form the base of locales) are standard, the actual locale
	names aren't always.  On some systems, the locale names are
	just the language base names; on others, they are the
	language names concatenated with country codes (e. g. en_US),
	while on others they are language codes concatenated with
	character sets.  We are not aware of any workaround for this,
	possibly short of actually running make install and then
	rebuilding the PPD's.  'make install' will install the
	message catalogs, and that may create the necessary locale
	directories.  This is not exactly a very elegant approach.

     The GNU gettext library (libintl.a) provides another environment
     variable, LANGUAGE, which unconditionally looks up translations
     according to the language, ignoring LANG and the LC_*
     environment variables that are normally used for translation.
     This library is no longer included with Gutenprint
     (--with-included-gettext will not work).  Install the GNU
     gettext package first if you need libintl.a.  Many systems
     provide translation machinery in their standard libraries, and
     it may not always be best to use foreign libraries to replace
     standard system functionality.

     We have chosen to use LANGUAGE for this purpose, as the GNU
     gettext library appears to offer the most reliable translation,
     and LANGUAGE appears to offer the most reliable mechanism.  We
     have actually found that LANG and LC_* can interfere with
     LANGUAGE, thus we do not use both.

     To determine if the translations are working, you must actually
     inspect the PPD files.  You will need to

     cd src/cups/ppd/sv
     gunzip *
     more *

     or the like to determine if this is successful.  In particular,
     look for LanguageVersion, and make sure that it is correct (it
     should be "Swedish" in the sv directory, for example), and also
     make sure that the paper sizes are also translated.  We
     currently suggest using the Swedish translation for this purpose
     as it is the most complete.

     If packagers find that the PPD files are all in English, rather
     than translated into the appropriate languages, we suggest the
     following:

     i) Install GNU gettext (libintl).  If your system is not based
	on GNU libc (Linux usually is based on GNU libc; BSD,
	Solaris, IRIX, etc. are not), you will need this to have any
	possibility of creating the translated PPD files.

     ii) Run 'make install' to install the package (including the
	message catalogs) onto the system first, and then do the
	following:

	cd src/cups
	rm ppd-stamp
	make

	to rebuild the PPD files.  Having the message catalogs on the
	system may permit this to succeed.

     iii) Ensure that your system actually has locales named 'sv',
	'pl', and all of the other supported languages, and change
	LANGUAGE to something more appropriate (most likely LANG,
	LC_MESSAGES, or LC_ALL).

     iv) Build the PPD files on a Linux-based system; they are
	portable.

     v) Use --disable-translated-cups-ppds on the configure command line
	to suppress the translated PPD files altogether.

     Please feel free to contact us about this issue.

  3) There are multiple issues that one must be aware of when using
     Foomatic with Gutenprint.

     i) Before installing any new release of Gutenprint 5.0, you must
	manually remove any existing Foomatic option files.  This is
	because the Foomatic utility to load data kits
	(foomatic-kitload) does not remove obsolete data files from
	the Foomatic database.  If you do not do this, any PPD files
	you generate will be incorrect and printing may work
	incorrectly or not at all.

	Foomatic option files are usually located in

	/usr/local/share/foomatic/db/source/opt

	or

	/usr/share/foomatic/db/source/opt

	Assuming they're in the former location, you must remove data
	files associated with the Gutenprint driver.  The command to do
	this, which must be run as the superuser (root) is

	cd /usr/local/share/foomatic/db/source/opt
	ls -l gutenprint-ijs*.xml

	If there are existing files present, you must remove them:

	rm -f gutenprint-ijs*.xml

	Now check to make sure that they are gone:

	ls -l gutenprint-ijs*.xml

	CAUTION: Be very careful when typing this command!  Minor
	errors in typing these commands may result in severe damage to
	your system.

	After this, you may run 'make install' in your Gutenprint
	source directory to install the package.  You will then need to
	re-create any printer queues using Foomatic.

	In general, you will have to perform this procedure any time
	you install a new version of Gutenprint.

	Please check the Foomatic site
	(http://www.linuxprinting.org/foomatic.html) and the Gutenprint
	site (http://gimp-print.sourceforge.net) for updated
	instructions about this.

     ii) Unlike with the CUPS native driver, there is no simple way to
	update all PPD files when you install a new version of
	Gutenprint.  You must either use the foomatic-ppdfile command
	to upgrade PPD files individually, or foomatic-compiledb to
	build all PPD files.  Your system may provide an alternate way
	to install new PPD files, in which case you may use that
	method.

     iii) The Foomatic data is version locked to the Gutenprint release
	installed on the system.  For example, PPD files generated
	with the Foomatic data for release 5.0.0 will not work with
	the ijsgutenprint in release 5.0.1.  This is to prevent
	accidentally using incorrect data, which could cause incorrect
	function to take place.

  4) There is a known complication building "escputil" that causes
     problems on some systems.  "escputil" uses the "readline"
     package, to support command editing and history within the
     program.  Unfortunately, linking programs with "readline" often
     requires linking against additional libraries, and the exact
     library depends upon the system (e. g. not all Linux systems have
     the same requirements).

     The configure script attempts to determine which additional
     library must be linked against.  It tries using the following
     libraries in this order to build a test executable:

     -lncurses
     -lcurses
     -ltermcap
     no additional libraries

     The reason it tries other libraries first is that some systems
     will link successfully, but only fail when an attempt is made to
     actually call readline.  Therefore, we assume that additional
     libraries are required.  Since we try the extra libraries in
     order from most recent to oldest, we expect that the first one we
     find will be appropriate.  For example, if the "ncurses" library
     is the standard on a given system, the "termcap" library may be
     provided for back compatibility, but it is unlikely that
     "termcap" will be the standard with "curses" or "ncurses" being
     provided for compatibility only (so that the link will succeed
     but the command will use the incorrect library).

     As this procedure is not failsafe, we provide the following
     configure options to control this behavior:

     ./configure --with-readline=yes  (the default; attempts to
				      determine the correct library
				      to link against)

     ./configure --with-readline=no   (turns off use of readline
				      altogether)

     ./configure --with-readline=only (specifically instructs
				      configure to not attempt to
				      link against any other
				      libraries)

     ./configure --with-readline=libs (specifies the libraries to be
				      linked against)

     An hypothetical (this won't work anywhere!) example of the
     latter would be

     ./configure --with-readline='-lncurses -ltermcap'

     Note that configure will not allow readline to be used if it
     cannot successfully build the test program, regardless of the
     option selected.  If you are having difficulty getting escputil
     to build, we suggest using --with-readline=no.  The commands
     used within escputil are very short and seldom require
     significant editing.

  5) The fix for bug 929227 (Gimp-Print incorrectly attempts to build
     against GIMP 2.0) requires special build instructions if you are
     using a very old version of the GIMP 1.2 (1.2.0, 1.2.1, or
     1.2.2).  Specifically, you must set GIMPTOOL in the environment
     to point to the proper version of gimptool when running
     Gutenprint's configure script.  For example:

     GIMPTOOL=/usr/bin/gimptool ./configure

     The bug fix involves checking for the presence of the GIMP
     slightly differently from how it was previously done.
     Previously, Gimp-Print checked for the presence of a program
     named "gimptool", which provides information about how to build
     plugins against the GIMP.  This worked correctly when only the
     GIMP 1.2 was installed, but not when the GIMP 2.0 was installed.

     The GIMP 2.0 actually installs a program named "gimptool-2.0",
     and creates a symbolic link named "gimptool" pointing to it.
     Later versions of the GIMP 1.2 (1.2.3, 1.2.4, 1.2.5, and any
     later versions that may be released) similarly create a program
     named "gimptool-1.2" and a symbolic link named "gimptool".  As
     the configure script prior to this bug fix simply checked for
     gimptool, it incorrectly detected a gimptool from the GIMP 2.0.

     The current configure script checks first for gimptool-1.2 and
     then for gimptool, and only accepts the use of a GIMP 1.2 version
     of one of these programs.  However, if you have one of the older
     versions of the GIMP 1.2 installed in a non-standard location,
     and you use --with-gimp-prefix or --with-gimp-exec-prefix to
     specify its location, the configure script will not automatically
     detect the correct location of gimptool, and you must specify it
     as described above.  Note that you must specify a copy of
     gimptool from the GIMP 1.2, not from the GIMP 2.0.  If your copy
     of the GIMP is installed in a standard location (typically
     /usr/bin or /usr/local/bin), you do not need to use
     --with-gimp-prefix or --with-gimp-exec-prefix, and therefore do
     not need to use this workaround.

     If you cannot upgrade to the GIMP 2.x, the Gutenprint and GIMP
     projects recommend upgrading to revision of the GIMP 1.2.5, which
     will not require this workaround.  This workaround is available
     in the event that you cannot or do not wish to upgrade your
     installation of the GIMP.


================================================================

V) SUPPORTED PRINTERS:

A) LIST OF SUPPORTED PRINTERS

The following is the complete list of printers believed to be
compatible with Gutenprint, along with the name of the driver.  Some
of these printers may work only partially; the specified drivers may
not support the full range of resolutions, paper sizes, media sources,
etc. that some of these printers may offer.

Our practice is to provide preliminary support for printers as soon as
we have information sufficient to code a functioning driver, and to
release this support even in an otherwise stable release.  In this
case, we note in the list below that support for a particular printer
is "Experimental".  It is likely that printers that are supported in
"Experimental" mode will produce poor quality at some or all
resolutions and in addition may not function correctly at some
resolutions.  Experimental Epson printers are most likely to produce
good output at the highest resolution offered (2880x720, 2880x1440,
2880x2880, or 5760x2880 DPI), since in general these printers will not
use multiple drop sizes at such high resolutions.

Note that Gutenprint supports only the printer in multi-function
devices -- this package does not support scanning, fax, copying, or
any other function.  For scanning, please see the SANE project
(http://www.sane-project.org).

Printer Name                   Driver Name                     Notes
------- ----                   ------ ----                     -----
Apollo P-2100                  pcl-apollo-p2100
Apollo P-2150                  pcl-apollo-p2150
Apollo P-2200                  pcl-apollo-p2200
Apollo P-2250                  pcl-apollo-p2250
Apollo P-2500                  pcl-apollo-p2500
Apollo P-2550                  pcl-apollo-p2550
Apollo P-2600                  pcl-apollo-p2600
Apollo P-2650                  pcl-apollo-p2650
Apple Color StyleWriter 4100   pcl-apple-4100
Apple Color StyleWriter 4500   pcl-apple-4500
Apple Color StyleWriter 6500   pcl-apple-6500
Apple LaserWriter Select 360   pcl-apple-lw360
Brother DCP-1200               brother-dcp-1200
Brother HL-4Ve                 brother-hl-4ve
Brother HL-10V                 brother-hl-10v
Brother HL-10h                 brother-hl-10h
Brother HL-630                 brother-hl-630
Brother HL-660                 brother-hl-660
Brother HL-760                 brother-hl-760
Brother HL-960                 brother-hl-960
Brother HL-1040                brother-hl-1040
Brother HL-1050                brother-hl-1050
Brother HL-1060                brother-hl-1060
Brother HL-1070                brother-hl-1070
Brother HL-1240                brother-hl-1240
Brother HL-1250                brother-hl-1250
Brother HL-1260                brother-hl-1260
Brother HL-1270N               brother-hl-1270n
Brother HL-1440                brother-hl-1440
Brother HL-1660e               brother-hl-1660e
Brother HL-2060                brother-hl-2060
Brother MFC-6550MC             brother-mfc-6550mc
Brother MFC-8300               brother-mfc-8300
Brother MFC-9500               brother-mfc-9500
Brother MFC-9600               brother-mfc-9600
Canon BJ-30                    bjc-30
Canon BJC-50                   bjc-50
Canon BJC-55                   bjc-55
Canon BJC-80                   bjc-80
Canon BJC-85                   bjc-85
Canon BJC-210                  bjc-210
Canon BJC-240                  bjc-240
Canon BJC-250                  bjc-250
Canon BJC-1000                 bjc-1000
Canon BJC-2000                 bjc-2000
Canon BJC-2010                 bjc-2010
Canon BJC-2100                 bjc-2100
Canon BJC-2110                 bjc-2110
Canon BJC-3000                 bjc-3000
Canon BJC-4000                 bjc-4000
Canon BJC-4300                 bjc-4300
Canon BJC-4400                 bjc-4400
Canon BJC-6000                 bjc-6000
Canon BJC-6100                 bjc-6100
Canon BJC-6200                 bjc-6200
Canon BJC-6500                 bjc-6500
Canon BJC-7000                 bjc-7000
Canon BJC-7100                 bjc-7100
Canon BJC-8200                 bjc-8200
Canon CP-100                   canon-cp100
Canon CP-200                   canon-cp200
Canon CP-220                   canon-cp220
Canon CP-300                   canon-cp300
Canon CP-330                   canon-cp330
Canon GP 335                   canon-gp_335
Canon LBP-4sx                  canon-lbp-4sx
Canon LBP-430                  canon-lbp-430
Canon LBP-1000                 canon-lbp-1000
Canon LBP-1260                 canon-lbp-1260
Canon LBP-1760                 canon-lbp-1760
Canon S100                     bjc-s100
Canon S200                     bjc-s200                        Experimental
Canon S300                     bjc-s300
Canon S400                     bjc-s400
Canon S450                     bjc-s450
Canon S500                     bjc-s500
Canon S600                     bjc-s600
Canon S630                     bjc-s630
Canon S800                     bjc-s800
Canon S4500                    bjc-s4500
Canon SELPHY-CP-400            canon-cp400
Canon SELPHY-CP-500            canon-cp500
Canon SELPHY-CP-510            canon-cp510
Canon SELPHY-CP-600            canon-cp600
Canon SELPHY-CP-710            canon-cp710
Canon iP4000                   bjc-iP4000                      Experimental
Canon imageRunner 330s         canon-ir_330s
Citizen ProJet II              citizen-projet_ii
DEC 1800                       dec-1800
DEC LN17                       dec-ln17
Epson ActionLaser 1100         epson-actl_1100
Epson ActionLaser II           epson-actl_ii
Epson AcuLaser C2000           epson-acl_c2000
Epson AcuLaser C2000PS         epson-acl_c2000ps
Epson AcuLaser C8500           epson-acl_c8500
Epson AcuLaser C8500PS         epson-acl_c8500ps
Epson AcuLaser C8600           epson-acl_c8600
Epson AcuLaser C8600PS         epson-acl_c8600ps
Epson EPL-5200                 epson-epl-5200
Epson EPL-5200+                epson-epl-5200plus
Epson EPL-5700                 epson-epl-5700
Epson EPL-5700PS               epson-epl-5700ps
Epson EPL-5800                 epson-epl-5800
Epson EPL-5800PS               epson-epl-5800ps
Epson EPL-5900                 epson-epl-5900
Epson EPL-5900PS               epson-epl-5900ps
Epson EPL-6100                 epson-epl-6100
Epson EPL-6100PS               epson-epl-6100ps
Epson EPL-7100                 epson-epl-7100
Epson Stylus C20               escp2-c20
Epson Stylus C20SX             escp2-c20sx
Epson Stylus C20UX             escp2-c20ux
Epson Stylus C40               escp2-c40
Epson Stylus C40SX             escp2-c40sx
Epson Stylus C40UX             escp2-c40ux
Epson Stylus C41               escp2-c41
Epson Stylus C41SX             escp2-c41sx
Epson Stylus C41UX             escp2-c41ux
Epson Stylus C42               escp2-c42
Epson Stylus C42SX             escp2-c42sx
Epson Stylus C42UX             escp2-c42ux
Epson Stylus C43               escp2-c43
Epson Stylus C43SX             escp2-c43sx
Epson Stylus C43UX             escp2-c43ux
Epson Stylus C44               escp2-c44
Epson Stylus C44SX             escp2-c44sx
Epson Stylus C44UX             escp2-c44ux
Epson Stylus C45               escp2-c45
Epson Stylus C46               escp2-c46
Epson Stylus C48               escp2-c48
Epson Stylus C50               escp2-c50
Epson Stylus C60               escp2-c60
Epson Stylus C61               escp2-c61
Epson Stylus C62               escp2-c62
Epson Stylus C63               escp2-c63
Epson Stylus C64               escp2-c64
Epson Stylus C65               escp2-c65
Epson Stylus C66               escp2-c66
Epson Stylus C68               escp2-c68
Epson Stylus C70               escp2-c70
Epson Stylus C80               escp2-c80
Epson Stylus C82               escp2-c82
Epson Stylus C83               escp2-c83
Epson Stylus C84               escp2-c84
Epson Stylus C85               escp2-c85
Epson Stylus C86               escp2-c86
Epson Stylus C88               escp2-c88
Epson Stylus Color             escp2
Epson Stylus Color I           escp2-i
Epson Stylus Color II          escp2-ii
Epson Stylus Color IIs         escp2-iis
Epson Stylus Color PRO         escp2-pro
Epson Stylus Pro XL            escp2-pro-xl
Epson Stylus Color 400         escp2-400
Epson Stylus Color 440         escp2-440
Epson Stylus Color 460         escp2-460
Epson Stylus Color 480         escp2-480
Epson Stylus Color 500         escp2-500
Epson Stylus Color 580         escp2-580
Epson Stylus Color 600         escp2-600
Epson Stylus Color 640         escp2-640
Epson Stylus Color 660         escp2-660
Epson Stylus Color 670         escp2-670
Epson Stylus Color 680         escp2-680
Epson Stylus Color 740         escp2-740
Epson Stylus Color 760         escp2-760
Epson Stylus Color 777         escp2-777
Epson Stylus Color 800         escp2-800
Epson Stylus Color 850         escp2-850
Epson Stylus Color 860         escp2-860
Epson Stylus Color 880         escp2-880
Epson Stylus Color 8 3         escp2-83
Epson Stylus Color 900         escp2-900
Epson Stylus Color 980         escp2-980
Epson Stylus Color 1160        escp2-1160
Epson Stylus Color 1500        escp2-1500
Epson Stylus Color 1520        escp2-1520
Epson Stylus Color 3000        escp2-3000
Epson Stylus Photo             escp2-photo
Epson Stylus Photo 700         escp2-700
Epson Stylus Photo EX          escp2-ex
Epson Stylus Photo EX3         escp2-ex3
Epson Stylus Photo 720         escp2-720
Epson Stylus Photo 750         escp2-750
Epson Stylus Photo 780         escp2-780
Epson Stylus Photo 785         escp2-785
Epson Stylus Photo 790         escp2-790
Epson Stylus Photo 810         escp2-810
Epson Stylus Photo 820         escp2-820
Epson Stylus Photo 825         escp2-825
Epson Stylus Photo 830         escp2-830
Epson Stylus Photo 830U        escp2-830u
Epson Stylus Photo 870         escp2-870
Epson Stylus Photo 875         escp2-875
Epson Stylus Photo 890         escp2-890
Epson Stylus Photo 895         escp2-895
Epson Stylus Photo 900         escp2-ph900
Epson Stylus Photo 915         escp2-915
Epson Stylus Photo 925         escp2-925
Epson Stylus Photo 935         escp2-935
Epson Stylus Photo 950         escp2-950
Epson Stylus Photo 960         escp2-960
Epson Stylus Photo 1200        escp2-1200
Epson Stylus Photo 1270        escp2-1270
Epson Stylus Photo 1280        escp2-1280
Epson Stylus Photo 1290        escp2-1290
Epson Stylus Photo 2000P       escp2-2000
Epson Stylus Photo 2100        escp2-2100
Epson Stylus Photo 2200        escp2-2200
Epson Stylus Photo R200        escp2-r200
Epson Stylus Photo R210        escp2-r210
Epson Stylus Photo R220        escp2-r220
Epson Stylus Photo R300        escp2-r300
Epson Stylus Photo R310        escp2-r310
Epson Stylus Photo R320        escp2-r320
Epson Stylus Photo R340        escp2-r340
Epson Stylus Photo RX400       escp2-rx400
Epson Stylus Photo RX420       escp2-rx420
Epson Stylus Photo RX425       escp2-rx425
Epson Stylus Photo RX430       escp2-rx430
Epson Stylus Photo RX500       escp2-rx500
Epson Stylus Photo RX510       escp2-rx510
Epson Stylus Photo RX600       escp2-rx600
Epson Stylus Photo RX620       escp2-rx620
Epson Stylus Photo RX630       escp2-rx630
Epson Stylus Photo RX700       escp2-rx700
Epson Stylus Photo R800        escp2-r800
Epson Stylus Photo R1800       escp2-r1800
Epson Stylus Photo R2400       escp2-r2400
Epson Stylus Pro 5000          escp2-5000
Epson Stylus Pro 5500          escp2-5500
Epson Stylus Pro 7000          escp2-7000
Epson Stylus Pro 7500          escp2-7500
Epson Stylus Pro 7600          escp2-7600
Epson Stylus Pro 9000          escp2-9000
Epson Stylus Pro 9500          escp2-9500
Epson Stylus Pro 9600          escp2-9600
Epson Stylus Pro 10000         escp2-10000
Epson Stylus Scan 2000         escp2-scan2000
Epson Stylus Scan 2500         escp2-scan2500
Epson Stylus CX1500            escp2-cx1500
Epson Stylus CX3100            escp2-cx3100
Epson Stylus CX3200            escp2-cx3200
Epson Stylus CX3500            escp2-cx3500
Epson Stylus CX3600            escp2-cx3600
Epson Stylus CX3650            escp2-cx3650
Epson Stylus CX3700            escp2-cx3700
Epson Stylus CX3800            escp2-cx3800
Epson Stylus CX3805            escp2-cx3805
Epson Stylus CX3810            escp2-cx3810
Epson Stylus CX4100            escp2-cx4100
Epson Stylus CX4200            escp2-cx4200
Epson Stylus CX4500            escp2-cx4500
Epson Stylus CX4600            escp2-cx4600
Epson Stylus CX4700            escp2-cx4700
Epson Stylus CX4800            escp2-cx4800
Epson Stylus CX5100            escp2-cx5100
Epson Stylus CX5200            escp2-cx5200
Epson Stylus CX5300            escp2-cx5300
Epson Stylus CX5400            escp2-cx5400
Epson Stylus CX5700            escp2-cx5700
Epson Stylus CX5800            escp2-cx5800
Epson Stylus CX6300            escp2-cx6300
Epson Stylus CX6400            escp2-cx6400
Epson Stylus CX6500            escp2-cx6500
Epson Stylus CX6600            escp2-cx6600
Epson Stylus CX7700            escp2-cx7700
Epson Stylus CX7800            escp2-cx7800
Epson Stylus CX8300            escp2-cx8300
Epson Stylus CX8400            escp2-cx8400
Epson Stylus D68               escp2-d68
Epson Stylus D88               escp2-d88
Epson Stylus DX3800            escp2-dx3800
Epson Stylus DX3850            escp2-dx3850
Epson Stylus DX4200            escp2-dx4200
Epson Stylus DX4250            escp2-dx4250
Epson Stylus DX4800            escp2-dx4800
Epson PictureMate              escp2-picmate
Epson PictureMate Deluxe       escp2-picmated
Epson CL 700                   escp2-cl700
Epson CL 750                   escp2-cl750
Epson CL 760                   escp2-cl760                     Experimental
Epson E 100                    escp2-e100
Epson E 150                    escp2-e150
Epson E 200                    escp2-e200
Epson EM 900C                  escp2-em900c
Epson EM 930C                  escp2-em930c
Epson MC 2000                  escp2-mc2000
Epson MC 5000                  escp2-mc5000
Epson MC 7000                  escp2-mc7000
Epson MC 9000                  escp2-mc9000
Epson MC 10000                 escp2-mc10000
Epson MJ 930C                  escp2-mj930c
Epson MJ 5100C                 escp2-mj5100c
Epson MJ 6000C                 escp2-mj6000c
Epson MJ 8000C                 escp2-mj8000c
Epson PM 700C                  escp2-pm700c
Epson PM 730C                  escp2-pm730c
Epson PM 740C                  escp2-pm740c                    Experimental
Epson PM 750C                  escp2-pm750c
Epson PM 760C                  escp2-pm760c
Epson PM 770C                  escp2-pm770c
Epson PM 780C                  escp2-pm780c
Epson PM 790PT                 escp2-pm790pt
Epson PM 800C                  escp2-pm800c
Epson PM 850PT                 escp2-pm850pt
Epson PM 870C                  escp2-pm870c                    Experimental
Epson PM 880C                  escp2-pm880c
Epson PM 930C                  escp2-pm930c                    Experimental
Epson PM 940C                  escp2-pm940c                    Experimental
Epson PM 950C                  escp2-pm950c
Epson PM 970C                  escp2-pm970c                    Experimental
Epson PM 980C                  escp2-pm980c                    Experimental
Epson PM 2000C                 escp2-pm2000c
Epson PM 2200C                 escp2-pm2200c
Epson PM 3000C                 escp2-pm3000c
Epson PM 3300C                 escp2-pm3300c
Epson PM 3500C                 escp2-pm3500c
Epson PM 3700C                 escp2-pm3700c                   Experimental
Epson PM 4000PX                escp2-pm4000px
Epson PM 5000C                 escp2-pm5000c
Epson PM 7000C                 escp2-pm7000c
Epson PM 9000C                 escp2-pm9000c
Epson PM 10000                 escp2-pm10000
Epson PM A650                  escp2-pma650                    Experimental
Epson PM A750                  escp2-pma750                    Experimental
Epson PM A890                  escp2-pma890                    Experimental
Epson PM A900                  escp2-pma900
Epson PM A950                  escp2-pma950
Epson PM D600                  escp2-pmd600                    Experimental
Epson PM D750                  escp2-pmd750
Epson PM D770                  escp2-pmd770
Epson PM D800                  escp2-pmd800                    Experimental
Epson PM D1000                 escp2-pmd1000
Epson PM G700                  escp2-pmg700
Epson PM G720                  escp2-pmg720
Epson PM G730                  escp2-pmg730
Epson PM G800                  escp2-pmg800                    Experimental
Epson PM G820                  escp2-pmg820                    Experimental
Epson PX A650                  escp2-pxa650
Epson PX G900                  escp2-pxg900
Epson PX G920                  escp2-pxg920
Epson PX G5000                 escp2-pxg5000
Epson PX V500                  escp2-pxv500
Epson PX V600                  escp2-pxv600
Epson PX V630                  escp2-pxv630
Epson PX 5500                  escp2-px5500
Epson PX 7000                  escp2-px7000
Epson PX 9000                  escp2-px9000
Fujifilm Printpix-CX-400       fujifilm-cx400
Fujifilm Printpix-CX-550       fujifilm-cx550
Fujitsu PrintPartner 10V       fujitsu-pp_10v
Fujitsu PrintPartner 16DV      fujitsu-pp_16dv
Fujitsu PrintPartner 20W       fujitsu-pp_20w
Fujitsu PrintPartner 8000      fujitsu-pp_8000
Generic PCL 4 Printer          pcl-g_4
Generic PCL 5 Printer          pcl-g_5
Generic PCL 5c Printer         pcl-g_5c
Generic PCL 5e Printer         pcl-g_5e
Generic PCL 6/PCL XL Printer   pcl-g_6
HP Business Inkjet 2200        hp-bij_2200
HP Business Inkjet 2230        hp-bij_2230
HP Business Inkjet 2250        hp-bij_2250
HP Business Inkjet 2250TN      hp-bij_2250tn
HP Business Inkjet 2280        hp-bij_2280
HP Color Inkjet Printer CP1160 hp-cij_cp1160
HP Color Inkjet Printer CP1700 hp-cij_cp1700
HP Color LaserJet 2500         hp-clj_2500
HP Color LaserJet 4500         hp-clj_4500
HP Color LaserJet 4550         hp-clj_4550
HP Color LaserJet 4600         hp-clj_4600
HP Color LaserJet 5            hp-clj_5
HP Color LaserJet 5000         hp-clj_5000
HP Color LaserJet 5500         hp-clj_5500
HP Color LaserJet 8550GN       hp-clj_8550gn
HP DesignJet 230               pcl-desnj-230
HP DesignJet 250C              pcl-desnj-250
HP DesignJet 430               pcl-desnj-430
HP DesignJet 450C              pcl-desnj-450
HP DesignJet 455CA             pcl-desnj-455
HP DesignJet 488CA             pcl-desnj-488
HP DesignJet 700               pcl-desnj-700
HP DesignJet 750C Plus         hp-desnj_750c_plus
HP DesignJet 750C              pcl-750
HP DesignJet 2500CP            pcl-desnj-2500
HP DesignJet 3500CP            pcl-desnj-3500
HP DesignJet ColorPro CAD      hp-desnj_cp_cad
HP DeskJet 400                 pcl-400
HP DeskJet 420C                hp-dj_420c
HP DeskJet 450                 hp-dj_450
HP DeskJet 500                 pcl-500
HP DeskJet 500C                pcl-501
HP DeskJet 505J Plus           hp-dj_505j_plus
HP DeskJet 510                 hp-dj_510
HP DeskJet 520                 pcl-520
HP DeskJet 540C                pcl-540
HP DeskJet 550C                pcl-550
HP DeskJet 5550                hp-dj_5550
HP DeskJet 5551                hp-dj_5551
HP DeskJet 560C                pcl-560
HP DeskJet 600                 pcl-600
HP DeskJet 600C                pcl-601
HP DeskJet 610C                hp-dj_610c
HP DeskJet 610CL               hp-dj_610cl
HP DeskJet 6122                hp-dj_6122
HP DeskJet 6127                hp-dj_6127
HP DeskJet 612C                hp-dj_612c
HP DeskJet 640C                hp-dj_640c
HP DeskJet 648C                hp-dj_648c
HP DeskJet 660C                hp-dj_660c
HP DeskJet 670C                hp-dj_670c
HP DeskJet 670TV               hp-dj_670tv
HP DeskJet 672C                hp-dj_672c
HP DeskJet 680C                hp-dj_680c
HP DeskJet 682C                hp-dj_682c
HP DeskJet 690C                pcl-690
HP DeskJet 692C                hp-dj_692c
HP DeskJet 693C                hp-dj_693c
HP DeskJet 694C                hp-dj_694c
HP DeskJet 695C                hp-dj_695c
HP DeskJet 697C                hp-dj_697c
HP DeskJet 810C                pcl-810
HP DeskJet 812C                pcl-812
HP DeskJet 815C                hp-dj_815c
HP DeskJet 816C                hp-dj_816c
HP DeskJet 825C                hp-dj_825c
HP DeskJet 830C                hp-dj_830c
HP DeskJet 832C                hp-dj_832c
HP DeskJet 840C                pcl-840
HP DeskJet 841C                hp-dj_841c
HP DeskJet 842C                pcl-842
HP DeskJet 843C                hp-dj_843c
HP DeskJet 845C                pcl-845
HP DeskJet 850C                pcl-850
HP DeskJet 855C                pcl-855
HP DeskJet 870C                pcl-870
HP DeskJet 880C                hp-dj_880c
HP DeskJet 882C                hp-dj_882c
HP DeskJet 890C                pcl-890
HP DeskJet 895C                pcl-895
HP DeskJet 916C                pcl-900
HP DeskJet 920C                hp-dj_920c
HP DeskJet 9300                hp-dj_9300
HP DeskJet 930C                hp-dj_930c
HP DeskJet 932C                hp-dj_932c
HP DeskJet 933C                hp-dj_933c
HP DeskJet 934C                hp-dj_934c
HP DeskJet 935C                hp-dj_935c
HP DeskJet 940C                hp-dj_940c
HP DeskJet 948C                hp-dj_948c
HP DeskJet 950C                hp-dj_950c
HP DeskJet 952C                hp-dj_952c
HP DeskJet 955C                hp-dj_955c
HP DeskJet 957C                hp-dj_957c
HP DeskJet 959C                hp-dj_959c
HP DeskJet 960C                hp-dj_960c
HP DeskJet 970C                hp-dj_970c
HP DeskJet 975C                hp-dj_975c
HP DeskJet 980C                hp-dj_980c
HP DeskJet 990C                hp-dj_990c
HP DeskJet 995C                hp-dj_995c
HP DeskJet 1100C               pcl-1100
HP DeskJet 1120C               pcl-1120
HP DeskJet 1125C               hp-dj_1125c
HP DeskJet 1200C               pcl-1200
HP DeskJet 1220C               pcl-1220
HP DeskJet 1600C               pcl-1600
HP DeskJet 1600CM              hp-dj_1600cm
HP DeskJet 2000                pcl-2000
HP DeskJet 2500                pcl-2500
HP DeskJet 2500CM              hp-2500cm
HP DeskJet 340C                pcl-340
HP DeskJet 3810                hp-dj_3810
HP DeskJet 3816                hp-dj_3816
HP DeskJet 3820                hp-dj_3820
HP DeskJet 3822                hp-dj_3822
HP LaserJet 2                  pcl-2
HP LaserJet 2D                 hp-lj_2d
HP LaserJet 2P Plus            hp-lj_2p_plus
HP LaserJet 2P                 pcl-2p
HP LaserJet 3                  pcl-3
HP LaserJet 3D                 hp-lj_3d
HP LaserJet 3P w/ PCL5         hp-lj_3p_w_pcl5
HP LaserJet 3P w/PS            hp-lj_3p_w_ps
HP LaserJet 4 Plus             hp-lj_4_plus
HP LaserJet 4                  pcl-4
HP LaserJet 4L                 pcl-4l
HP LaserJet 4M                 hp-lj_4m
HP LaserJet 4ML                hp-lj_4ml
HP LaserJet 4P                 hp-lj_4p
HP LaserJet 4Si                pcl-4si
HP LaserJet 4V                 pcl-4v
HP LaserJet 5                  pcl-5
HP LaserJet 5L                 hp-lj_5l
HP LaserJet 5M                 hp-lj_5m
HP LaserJet 5MP                hp-lj_5mp
HP LaserJet 5P                 hp-lj_5p
HP LaserJet 5Si                pcl-5si
HP LaserJet 6                  pcl-6
HP LaserJet 6L                 hp-lj_6l
HP LaserJet 6MP                hp-lj_6mp
HP LaserJet 6P                 hp-lj_6p
HP LaserJet 1010               hp-lj_1010
HP LaserJet 1012               hp-lj_1012
HP LaserJet 1015               hp-lj_1015
HP LaserJet 1100               hp-lj_1100
HP LaserJet 1100A              hp-lj_1100a
HP LaserJet 1150               hp-lj_1150
HP LaserJet 1200               hp-lj_1200
HP LaserJet 1220               hp-lj_1220
HP LaserJet 1300               hp-lj_1300
HP LaserJet 2100               hp-lj_2100
HP LaserJet 2100M              hp-lj_2100m
HP LaserJet 2200               hp-lj_2200
HP LaserJet 2300               hp-lj_2300
HP LaserJet 3200               hp-lj_3200
HP LaserJet 3200m              hp-lj_3200m
HP LaserJet 3200se             hp-lj_3200se
HP LaserJet 3300 MFP           hp-lj_3300_mfp
HP LaserJet 3310 MFP           hp-lj_3310_mfp
HP LaserJet 3320 MFP           hp-lj_3320_mfp
HP LaserJet 3320N MFP          hp-lj_3320n_mfp
HP LaserJet 3330 MFP           hp-lj_3330_mfp
HP LaserJet 4000               hp-lj_4000
HP LaserJet 4050               hp-lj_4050
HP LaserJet 4100               hp-lj_4100
HP LaserJet 4200               hp-lj_4200
HP LaserJet 4300               hp-lj_4300
HP LaserJet 5000               hp-lj_5000
HP LaserJet 5100               hp-lj_5100
HP LaserJet 8000               hp-lj_8000
HP LaserJet 8100               hp-lj_8100
HP LaserJet 8150               hp-lj_8150
HP LaserJet 9000               hp-lj_9000
HP Mopier 240                  hp-mopier_240
HP Mopier 320                  hp-mopier_320
HP OfficeJet 300               hp-oj_300
HP OfficeJet 330               hp-oj_330
HP OfficeJet 350               hp-oj_350
HP OfficeJet 500               hp-oj_500
HP OfficeJet 520               hp-oj_520
HP OfficeJet 570               hp-oj_570
HP OfficeJet 580               hp-oj_580
HP OfficeJet 590               hp-oj_590
HP OfficeJet 600               hp-oj_600
HP OfficeJet 610               hp-oj_610
HP OfficeJet 625               hp-oj_625
HP OfficeJet 630               hp-oj_630
HP OfficeJet 635               hp-oj_635
HP OfficeJet 700               hp-oj_700
HP OfficeJet 710               hp-oj_710
HP OfficeJet 720               hp-oj_720
HP OfficeJet 725               hp-oj_725
HP OfficeJet 5105              hp-oj_5105
HP OfficeJet 5110              hp-oj_5110
HP OfficeJet 5110xi            hp-oj_5110xi
HP OfficeJet 6105              hp-oj_6105
HP OfficeJet 6110              hp-oj_6110
HP OfficeJet 7110              hp-oj_7110
HP OfficeJet 7130              hp-oj_7130
HP OfficeJet 7140              hp-oj_7140
HP OfficeJet D125              hp-oj_d125
HP OfficeJet D135              hp-oj_d135
HP OfficeJet D145              hp-oj_d145
HP OfficeJet D155              hp-oj_d155
HP OfficeJet G55               hp-oj_g55
HP OfficeJet G85               hp-oj_g85
HP OfficeJet G95               hp-oj_g95
HP OfficeJet K60               hp-oj_k60
HP OfficeJet K60xi             hp-oj_k60xi
HP OfficeJet K80               hp-oj_k80
HP OfficeJet K80xi             hp-oj_k80xi
HP OfficeJet LX                hp-oj_lx
HP OfficeJet Pro 1150C         hp-oj_pro_1150c
HP OfficeJet Pro 1170C         hp-oj_pro_1170c
HP OfficeJet Pro 1175C         hp-oj_pro_1175c
HP OfficeJet R40               hp-oj_r40
HP OfficeJet R45               hp-oj_r45
HP OfficeJet R60               hp-oj_r60
HP OfficeJet R65               hp-oj_r65
HP OfficeJet R80               hp-oj_r80
HP OfficeJet T45               hp-oj_t45
HP OfficeJet T65               hp-oj_t65
HP OfficeJet V40               hp-oj_v40
HP OfficeJet V40xi             hp-oj_v40xi
HP OfficeJet                   hp-oj
HP PSC 370                     hp-psc_370
HP PSC 380                     hp-psc_380
HP PSC 500                     hp-psc_500
HP PSC 750                     hp-psc_750
HP PSC 950                     hp-psc_950
HP PSC 950xi                   hp-psc_950xi
HP PSC 2110                    hp-psc_2110
HP PSC 2150                    hp-psc_2150
HP PSC 2210                    hp-psc_2210
HP PhotoSmart 7150             hp-psc_7150
HP PhotoSmart 7345             hp-psc_7345
HP PhotoSmart 7350             hp-psc_7350
HP PhotoSmart 7550             hp-psc_7550
HP PhotoSmart P100             hp-psc_p100
HP PhotoSmart P130             hp-psc_p130
HP PhotoSmart P230             hp-psc_p230
HP PhotoSmart P1000            pcl-P1000
HP PhotoSmart P1100            pcl-P1100
HP PhotoSmart P1115            hp-psc_p1115
HP PhotoSmart P1215            hp-psc_p1215
HP PhotoSmart P1218            hp-psc_p1218
HP PhotoSmart P1315            hp-psc_p1315
HP e-printer e20               hp-e-printer_e20
IBM 4019                       ibm-4019
IBM 4029 030 LaserPrinter 10   ibm-4029_030_lp_10
IBM 4312                       ibm-4312
IBM Infoprint 12               ibm-infoprint_12
IBM Page Printer 3112          ibm-pp_3112
Infotec 4651 MF                infotec-4651_mf
Kyocera F-1010                 kyocera-f-1010
Kyocera FS-600 (KPDL-2)        kyocera-fs-600_kpdl-2
Kyocera FS-600                 kyocera-fs-600
Kyocera FS-680                 kyocera-fs-680
Kyocera FS-800                 kyocera-fs-800
Kyocera FS-1000                kyocera-fs-1000
Kyocera FS-1000+               kyocera-fs-1000plus
Kyocera FS-1010                kyocera-fs-1010
Kyocera FS-1050                kyocera-fs-1050
Kyocera FS-1200                kyocera-fs-1200
Kyocera FS-1600                kyocera-fs-1600
Kyocera FS-1600+               kyocera-fs-1600plus
Kyocera FS-1700                kyocera-fs-1700
Kyocera FS-1700+               kyocera-fs-1700plus
Kyocera FS-1750                kyocera-fs-1750
Kyocera FS-1800                kyocera-fs-1800
Kyocera FS-1800+               kyocera-fs-1800plus
Kyocera FS-1900                kyocera-fs-1900
Kyocera FS-3500                kyocera-fs-3500
Kyocera FS-3600                kyocera-fs-3600
Kyocera FS-3600+               kyocera-fs-3600plus
Kyocera FS-3700                kyocera-fs-3700
Kyocera FS-3700+               kyocera-fs-3700plus
Kyocera FS-3750                kyocera-fs-3750
Kyocera FS-3800                kyocera-fs-3800
Kyocera FS-5800C               kyocera-fs-5800c
Kyocera FS-5900C               kyocera-fs-5900c
Kyocera FS-6500                kyocera-fs-6500
Kyocera FS-6500+               kyocera-fs-6500plus
Kyocera FS-6700                kyocera-fs-6700
Kyocera FS-7000                kyocera-fs-7000
Kyocera FS-7000+               kyocera-fs-7000plus
Kyocera FS-8000C               kyocera-fs-8000c
Kyocera FS-9000                kyocera-fs-9000
Kyocera FS-9100DN              kyocera-fs-9100dn
Kyocera FS-9500DN              kyocera-fs-9500dn
Kyocera KM-1530                kyocera-km-1530
Kyocera KM-1810                kyocera-km-1810
Kyocera KM-2030                kyocera-km-2030
Kyocera KM-2530                kyocera-km-2530
Kyocera KM-3530                kyocera-km-3530
Kyocera KM-4230                kyocera-km-4230
Kyocera KM-4530                kyocera-km-4530
Kyocera KM-5230                kyocera-km-5230
Kyocera KM-5530                kyocera-km-5530
Kyocera KM-6230                kyocera-km-6230
Lexmark 4076                   lexmark-4076
Lexmark Optra E                lexmark-optra_e
Lexmark Optra E+               lexmark-optra_eplus
Lexmark Valuewriter 300        lexmark-vw_300
Lexmark Z42                    lexmark-z42
Lexmark Z43                    lexmark-z43
Lexmark Z52                    lexmark-z52
Lexmark Z53                    lexmark-z53
Minolta PagePro 1100           minolta-pp_1100
Minolta PagePro 6              minolta-pp_6
Minolta PagePro 6e             minolta-pp_6e
Minolta PagePro 6ex            minolta-pp_6ex
Minolta PagePro 8              minolta-pp_8
Minolta PagePro 8L             minolta-pp_8l
NEC SuperScript 1260           nec-ssc_1260
NEC SuperScript 1400           nec-ssc_1400
NEC SuperScript 1800           nec-ssc_1800
NEC SuperScript 660i           nec-ssc_660i
NEC SuperScript 860            nec-ssc_860
NEC SuperScript 870            nec-ssc_870
Okidata OL400                  okidata-ol400
Okidata OL400e                 okidata-ol400e
Okidata OL400ex                okidata-ol400ex
Okidata OL410e                 okidata-ol410e
Okidata OL600e                 okidata-ol600e
Okidata OL610e/S               okidata-ol610e_s
Okidata OL800                  okidata-ol800
Okidata OL810ex                okidata-ol810ex
Okidata Okipage 6e             okidata-okp_6e
Okidata Okipage 6ex            okidata-okp_6ex
Okidata Okipage 8p             okidata-okp_8p
Okidata Okipage 10e            okidata-okp_10e
Okidata Okipage 10ex           okidata-okp_10ex
Okidata Okipage 14ex           okidata-okp_14ex
Okidata Super 6e               okidata-super_6e
Olivetti JP350S                olivetti-jp350s
Olivetti PG 306                olivetti-pg_306
Olympus P-10                   olympus-p10
Olympus P-11                   olympus-p11
Olympus P-200                  olympus-p200
Olympus P-300                  olympus-p300
Olympus P-300E                 olympus-p300e
Olympus P-300U                 olympus-p300u
Olympus P-330E                 olympus-p330e
Olympus P-330NE                olympus-p330ne
Olympus P-400                  olympus-p400
Olympus P-440                  olympus-p440
PCPI 1030                      pcpi-1030
Panasonic KX-P4410             panasonic-kx-p4410
Panasonic KX-P4450             panasonic-kx-p4450
Panasonic KX-P6150             panasonic-kx-p6150
Panasonic KX-P6500             panasonic-kx-p6500
Raven LP-410                   raven-lp-410
Ricoh Aficio 220               ricoh-afc_220
Ricoh Aficio 401               ricoh-afc_401
Ricoh Aficio 700               ricoh-afc_700
Samsung ML-85                  samsung-ml-85
Samsung ML-4600                samsung-ml-4600
Samsung ML-5000a               samsung-ml-5000a
Samsung ML-6000                samsung-ml-6000
Samsung ML-6100                samsung-ml-6100
Samsung ML-7000                samsung-ml-7000
Samsung ML-7000N               samsung-ml-7000n
Samsung ML-7000P               samsung-ml-7000p
Samsung ML-7050                samsung-ml-7050
Samsung QL-5100A               samsung-ql-5100a
Samsung QL-6050                samsung-ql-6050
Seiko SpeedJET 200             seiko-sj_200
Sharp AR-161                   sharp-ar-161
Sony IJP-V100                  sony-ijp-v100
Sony UP-DP10                   sony-updp10                     Experimental
Sony UP-DR150                  sony-updr150                    Experimental
Star LS-04                     star-ls-04
Star LaserPrinter 8            star-lp_8
Tally MT908                    tally-mt908
Xerox Able 1406                xerox-able_1406
Xerox DocuPrint 4508           xerox-dp_4508
Xerox DocuPrint C20            xerox-dp_c20
Xerox DocuPrint N4512          xerox-dp_n4512
Xerox DocuPrint N4512PS        xerox-dp_n4512ps
Xerox DocuPrint P12            xerox-dp_p12
Xerox DocuPrint P1202          xerox-dp_p1202
Xerox DocuPrint P8e            xerox-dp_p8e
Xerox Document Centre 400      xerox-dc_400


----------------

B) PRINTER-SPECIFIC NOTES:

  1) Support for color laser printers (e. g. Color LaserJet printers)
     is currently black and white only.  We do not have a schedule for
     implementing color support for these printers.

  2) The Gutenprint driver does not in all cases offer the same set of
     resolutions offered by the printer manufacturer's drivers.  There
     are a variety of reasons why that is the case:

     i) In some cases, we have not determined the necessary commands
	to utilize some resolutions (particularly very high
	resolutions).

     ii) In some cases, the advertised printer resolution may not
	match what we determine to be the maximum resolution based on
	our understanding of the printer's capabilities.  Sometimes
	the advertised resolution is qualified by a statement that
	implies that the actual resolution may be different from the
	stated resolution.  In some cases, we may be able to achieve
	the same number of drops per square inch by means of a
	different resolution.  For example, we may determine that a
	printer that is advertised to support 5760x720 DPI in fact
	supports 2880x1440 DPI.  This is the same number of droplets
	per square inch (4147200), but with a different aspect ratio
	(the ratio of the horizontal resolution to the vertical
	resolution).

     iii) In some cases, we offer additional resolutions not offered by
	the printer vendor.  These resolutions may be either lower or
	higher than those offered by the printer vendor.

	We frequently offer lower resolutions than those offered by
	the printer vendor to offer a greater choice of printing
	speed.  These resolutions will offer low quality but very
	fast printing speed for use where the quality is unimportant
	but speed is of the greatest importance.

	In some cases, we offer resolutions higher (or simply
	different) than those advertised by printer vendors.  We will
	offer these options if testing determines that these
	resolutions can be used safely and we determine that these
	resolutions offer a potential benefit in quality in some
	cases.

	It is almost always better to have a printing resolution with
	a smaller aspect ratio (i. e. the horizontal and vertical
	resolutions are similar).  For example, a resolution of
	2880x1440 DPI is likely to yield superior results to a
	resolution of 5760x720 DPI.  Therefore, in some cases we do
	not offer certain resolutions offered by the printer vendor
	(in the case of the Epson Stylus Photo R800, 5760x1440 DPI)
	because they are not likely to yield any benefit (either speed
	or quality) over another resolution that we offer (in this
	case, 2880x1440 DPI Highest Quality).

	Indeed, we have received reports that in some cases a lower
	resolution may actually offer improved quality over a higher
	resolution.  For example, the Epson Stylus Photo 780 is
	reported to yield better quality at 1440x720 DPI Highest
	Quality than 2880x720 DPI.

     We periodically evaluate the list of resolutions we offer to
     decide whether to offer any additional options.

  3) Many Epson printers (specifically, the Epson Stylus Color 740 and
     all newer printers) will not respond to ASCII text without a
     special "activation" sequence (specifically, this command takes
     the printers out of "packet mode").  A brand new printer, or one
     that has been connected to a Windows system, may or may not work
     in packet mode.  Therefore, the common suggestion to test a
     printer port by sending plain text to it may not work for these
     printers; failure to print in this fashion is not a positive
     indication that the printer or the connection is malfunctioning.
     These printers are, however, able to print plain text *after* the
     activation sequence is sent.

     A suggestion would be to first verify that the printer is capable
     of returning ink levels.  This may be done via

     escputil -i -r /dev/lp0

     (or whatever device your printer is connected to in place of
     /dev/lp0).  If this returns status, it demonstrates that the link
     between your computer and printer is working.

  4) It is strongly recommended that four color mode not be used on
     the Epson Stylus C63, C64, C65, C66, C70, C80, and CX-5200, and
     the PX-V500 and PX-V600 when printing to glossy papers, as the
     black ink is formulated differently from the color ink and does
     not adhere properly to these papers.  Epson Photo Paper, Premium
     Glossy Photo Paper, Premium Luster Photo Paper, and Premium
     Semigloss Photo Paper are known to be affected.  If you use the
     default settings (specifically, the Standard ink type), this will
     be handled automatically.


================================================================

VI) LIST OF SUPPORTED OPTIONS

This section details the options available in this release of
Gutenprint 5.0.  More advanced options are subject to change between
releases, and existing options may acquire additional choices as new
capabilities are added.

These options are not supported by all printers; depending upon the
functionality of the driver and printer, different capabilities are
available for different printers.

----------------

A) BASIC PRINTER OPTIONS

    These options control basic printer functions.

        Printer Model

                Select the printer to use.  It must always be
                supplied.  When using CUPS or Foomatic, the printer
                will automatically be selected via the chosen PPD
                file; with the Print plugin for the GIMP, it is
                selected in the Setup Printer dialog.

        Page Size

                Select the paper (media) size to print to.  Some
                printers support custom paper sizes, while others only
                support certain preset sizes.  This must always be
                supplied.

                Note that this option refers to the actual size of the
                media, not the printable area.  For example, selecting
                A4 refers to actual A4 paper, whatever the margins may
                be.

        Double-Sided Printing

                Otherwise known as "duplex" printing, this is offered
                for printers capable of printing on both sides of the
                page.  In addition to single-sided printing, there are
                two modes of duplex operation: the page may be flipped
                over its long edge (like a book), or over the short
                edge (like a note pad; this is sometimes referred to
                as Tumble).

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Media Type

                Select the kind of paper or other media being printed
                to.  This enables the printer and driver to be set up
                appropriately for the kind of paper in use.  Most
                printers offer a choice of supported media types.

                It is important to set the Media Type to the correct
                value if possible, or if not to a closely related
                medium.  The printer may need to know what kind of
                media is in use to determine how to feed the paper
                correctly; the driver needs to know in order to select
                the right output settings.

        Media Source

                Select the source of the paper or other media.  This
                option is offered with printers that have multiple
                feeds, for example multiple paper bins, manual feed,
                printing directly to a CD, etc.

        Ink Set

                Select the kind of ink in use in the printer, for
                printers offering different optional inks (for
                example, ink designed for matte paper vs. ink designed
                for glossy paper).

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Borderless

                Select whether to print with borders or not, for
                printers with the capability to print to the edge of
                the page.  This is otherwise known as "full bleed".

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Resolution

                Select the resolution to print at (dots per inch).  In
                general, higher resolutions produce better quality, at
                the expense of additional time.

                As a general rule of thumb, on laser printers and
                older inkjet printers resolutions of 300 DPI or
                thereabouts provide draft quality; lower resolutions
                provide economy draft quality and cannot produce solid
                black.  Resolutions of 600 or 720 DPI produce good
                quality output; higher resolutions are useful for very
                high quality image or graphic output.  Newer inkjet
                printers, with smaller ink drop sizes, typically
                require higher resolutions to produce acceptable
                output; in some cases even 1440x720 DPI does not
                produce good quality.

                Users of Epson inkjet printers have another setting
                available: the Quality option can be used to
                indirectly control the printer resolution, among other
                things.  This offers a simpler way to control output
                quality.


----------------

B) ADVANCED PRINTER OPTIONS

    These options control less frequently used printer options.  All
    of these options are new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        CD Hub Size

                This setting may be used on printers with the
                capability to print directly to a CD.  Depending upon
                your choice of media, you may be able to safely print
                all the way to the inner hole of the CD, or you may
                not be able to print any closer than the hub about an
                inch from the center.

        CD Horizontal Fine Adjustment
        CD Vertical Fine Adjustment

                These settings allow you to shift the position of the
                print while printing to a CD.  If you find that your
                print is not centered on the CD surface, you may need
                to adjust these setting to compensate.

        Enhanced Gloss

                Some newer printers have a cartridge of "gloss
                enhancer", which helps solve the problem of pigment
                inks having an inconsistent lustre on glossy paper.
                Use this option to enable use of the gloss enhancer.

        Laminate Pattern

                Some dye sublimation printers are able achieve better
                durability of output by covering it with transparent
                laminate surface. This surface can be of different
                patterns: common are matte, glossy or texture.


----------------

C) SPECIALIZED PRINTER OPTIONS

    These options control unusual printer features.  They may be
    useful in certain circumstances; generally the default settings
    will work optimally.

        Ink Type

                Select which subset of inks to use for printing.  For
                example, on a photo printer with additional light cyan
                and light magenta inks, it's possible to print with
                only the standard cyan, magenta, yellow, and black
                inks.

                Normally there is no reason to use any setting other
                than the default.  Reasons why one might want to use
                it include:

                1) Some black inks are not compatible with certain
                   glossy papers.  If the black ink smudges on your
                   paper, you may elect to use an option without black
                   ink (a "composite" setting).

                2) Some inks or paper/ink combinations produce color
                   shifts when the light inks are used.  If your
                   chosen combination produces unacceptable color
                   shifts or color casts, you may prefer to use the
                   Four Color Standard option, which will generally
                   yield more consistent color at the expense of
                   "grainier" output.

        Printing Direction

                Most inkjet printers can print either unidirectionally
                (the head prints only when moving in one direction) or
                bidirectionally (the head prints when moving in both
                directions).  Bidirectional printing is generally
                faster, since the printer is printing at all times
                rather than wasting much of the time returning the
                head to the starting position.  On many printers,
                however, unidirectional printing produces better
                quality output than bidirectional printing.

                The standard setting for this option adapts to the
                printing resolution.

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0, but Gimp-Print
		4.2 offered this option in the form of extra
		resolution choices.

        Interleave Method

                Most inkjet printers create the printed image using
                multiple overlapping passes of the print head.  On
                many printers this function is performed within the
                printer itself and cannot be adjusted, but with many
                Epson inkjet printers (and some others), this is
                performed by the driver or may be specified to the
                printer.  One advantage of the multiple overlapping
                passes is that it can hide small differences between
                the individual print head nozzles, which would
                otherwise be visible as banding.  The different
                interleave methods are different strategies for
                for performing this overlapping; some are better at
                hiding the banding than others.  They all require the
                same amount of time to print.

                Generally it is not necessary to adjust this; in some
                cases, depending upon your printer, you may find that
                one pattern or another performs better.

                On Epson Stylus Pro printers, this option allows
                specifying different overlap patterns within the
                printer.  In this case, the choice of overlap pattern
                may affect both the printing time and the quality to a
                significant degree.

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Adjust dot size as necessary

                This option is provided on many Epson inkjet printers
                to allow you to use larger ink drops than those
                normally used for the resolution chosen.  This may be
                necessary if you use certain kinds of media or for
                some reason wish to use much more ink (higher density)
                than the default.  It should not be necessary to use
                this option.

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0.


----------------

D) BASIC OUTPUT CONTROLS

        Output Type

                This option specifies whether to print in color or
                black and white/grayscale (using only black inks).
                Black and white printing is generally faster than
                color printing, even if the item being printed is
                entirely black and white.  However, printing with only
                black ink may yield a "grainy" appearance.

		This option was present in Gutenprint 4.2, but it
		offered an additional option of "black and white",
		which printed everything as either black or white (no
		grayscale).  The Gutenprint 5.0 equivalent is to set
		Color Correction to Threshold.

        Color Correction

                This selects the choice of color correction method
                within Gutenprint.  The following options are
                presently offered:

                * DEFAULT: Select a color correction mode appropriate
                  for the document type being printed.

                * HIGH ACCURACY: Apply optimum color correction to the
                  output to produce the best color quality.  This
                  corrects the hue, brightness, and saturation
                  (brilliance of color).  This is the normal setting
                  to use for printing photographs or graphics if you
                  are not using any external color management.

                * BRIGHT COLORS: Apply color correction to the output,
                  but generate more brilliant colors in some cases.

                * CORRECT HUE ONLY: Apply color correction to the
                  output, but correct only the hue.  This option does
                  not correct brightness and saturation.

                * UNCORRECTED: Do not apply any color correction to
                  the output beyond generating linear output.  This is
                  the best setting to use when utilizing external
                  color management; the high accuracy modes employ
                  correction algorithms that may not work well with
                  color management.

                  Note that if you use color management you should use
                  profiles created with Gutenprint and with the exact
                  settings that you plan to print with.  Profiles
                  provided by the printer vendor are calibrated for
                  the vendor's driver, which may not be identical to
                  Gutenprint's calibration.  In addition, profiles
                  created using Gimp-Print 4.2 or earlier will
                  generally not perform well with Gutenprint 5.0.

                * DESATURATED: Print in pure grayscale, but using
                  color inks.  The result is somewhat different from
                  printing in black and white using the Output Type
                  option -- the driver may use color ink, which
                  generates smoother output and may yield better
                  results on many papers.

                * THRESHOLD: Convert all colors to fully on or fully
                  off, eliminating all gradual tonal gradations.  The
                  result is that the output will consist of all very
                  pure colors.

                * DENSITY: Correct only the amount of ink ("density"),
                  otherwise performing no correction at all, even for
                  linearity.  Prints made with this option will
                  usually be very dark if no other color management is
                  used.  This may be useful if you are printing in 16
                  bit precision or are using your own linearization
                  curves.

                * RAW: Perform no correction at all, even for
                  density.  Prints made with this option will be very
                  dark and may bleed (or even puddle!) ink if not used
                  with external color management and linearization.
                  This option may be useful if you are using external
                  color management and linearization to get extremely
                  saturated dark colors by using more ink in
                  individual channels.  It should be used with extreme
                  caution, as it is very easy to damage the printer if
                  you are not careful.

                * PRE-DITHERED: Interpret each pixel as the actual
                  size of each drop to be printed.  Legal values of
                  the drop sizes differ between printers; all printers
                  support 0 (no droplet) and 1 (the largest droplet).
                  Some printers support four levels (0, 1, 2, and 3).

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0, but its function
		was partially encompassed by the Image Type option.


        Image Type

                Specify the option that best describes your print job.
                Your choice here will affect the processing of the
                print job.  Currently available settings are:

                * TEXT: Optimize the output for printing black text
                  with no graphics.  This option results in crisp
                  output and is very fast, but will yield very poor
                  results with any color or grayscale graphics.

                * GRAPHICS: Optimize the output for printing color
                  graphics.  This option will generate smooth, bright
                  output.

                * MIXED TEXT AND GRAPHICS: Optimize the output for
                  printing a mixture of text and graphics.

                * PHOTOGRAPH: Optimize the output for printing
                  photographs.  This option will generate smooth
                  tones and high quality colors, but will be slower
                  than the other options.

                * LINE ART: Optimize the output for printing black and
                  white line art with intricate detail.

                * MANUAL CONTROL: Do not bias the output at all; use
                  only the settings specified by the user.

		This option was present in Gimp-Print 4.2, but with
		fewer choices and more restrictions on their use.  Its
		functioned more like the Color Correction option in
		Gutenprint 5.0.


        Print Quality

                Specify the desired output quality using convenient
                presets.  Where this option is available, Gutenprint
                will automatically adjust the printing resolution and
                other options to generate the desired quality.
                Settings chosen with this option may be overridden by
                explicitly setting other settings, such as resolution.
                Not all printers offer all of these options.
                Currently available settings, in increasing order of
                quality, include:

                * FAST ECONOMY: Use the fastest printing mode
                  available on the printer to print with a minimum
                  amount of ink.  This option will produce very washed
                  out colors and grays, and will typically be
                  extremely grainy and streaky.

                * ECONOMY: Print very rapidly with a reduced amount of
                  ink.  This option will produce washed out colors and
                  grays and will typically be quite grainy and
                  streaky.

                * DRAFT: Print low quality draft output quickly.  This
                  option will typically produce acceptable colors with
                  some amount of grain on plain paper, but will
                  typically produce washed out and grainy output on
                  high quality papers.  On some printers this may
                  employ a special draft mode to print especially
                  quickly at the expense of color fidelity.

                * STANDARD: Print at a normal quality level for text
                  or text/graphics on plain paper or basic inkjet
                  paper.  This option will typically produce
                  acceptable colors, but on high quality papers the
                  output may be grainy or somewhat washed out.  This
                  option may also be useful for printing draft copies
                  of photographs on coated inkjet paper.

                * HIGH: Print final copies of text or text/graphics on
                  plain paper or inkjet paper.  This option will
                  typically produce good color quality, but the
                  quality may not be optimal for photographs on glossy
                  paper.  This option may also be useful for printing
                  draft copies of photographs on glossy paper.

                * PHOTO: Print photographs on glossy paper or very
                  high quality text, text/graphics, or line art on
                  high quality paper.  In the latter application this
                  will produce output close to laser printer quality.
                  On the highest quality premium papers the result may
                  still be a bit grainy.

                * SUPER PHOTO: Print photographs on glossy paper with
                  very high quality.  This will generally yield very
                  good results on high quality premium paper but may
                  be overkill on other papers.  This option is only
                  offered on printers capable of producing very high
                  quality output rivaling traditional photographic
                  printing.  This option may also be appropriate for
                  very intricate line art, where the required
                  resolution may exceed the capabilities of laser
                  printers.

                * ULTRA PHOTO: Print photographs on premium papers
                  with extremely high quality.  This option is only
                  offered on printers capable of producing extremely
                  high quality output matching or exceeding
                  traditional photographic printing.

                * BEST: Print with the best quality available on the
                  printer for the application chosen.  This may be
                  equivalent to one of the other settings; on a very
                  few printers the resolution may exceed that of Ultra
                  Photo mode.

                * MANUAL CONTROL: Do not adjust the settings at all;
                  use only the settings specified by the user.

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0.


----------------

E) BASIC OUTPUT ADJUSTMENTS

        Saturation

                This option controls the vividness of the output
                color; higher values produce more vivid colors.  Very
                low values produce muted colors; setting this to zero
                produces gray.

        Contrast

                This controls the contrast of the output.  Lower
                values produce less tonal range in the midtones
                (lighter colors become darker, and darker colors
                become lighter), which may allow for more definition
                in the highlights and shadows.  Higher values do the
                opposite: lighter colors become even lighter, while
                darker colors become even darker.

		This option behaves differently from its equivalent in
		Gimp-Print 4.2.  In Gimp-Print 4.2, setting contrast
		less than 1 changed the white point and black point:
		white became light gray and black became dark gray.
		In Gutenprint 5.0 this control changes the shape of
		the curve, but the black and white points remain the
		same.  The Linear Contrast Adjustment option described
		below restores the Gimp-Print 4.2 behavior.

        Brightness

                This control adjusts the general brightness of the
                print; higher values produce generally lighter output,
                while lower values produce generally darker output.
                White and black are not changed; colors also retain
                their hue and saturation.

		This option behaves differently from its equivalent in
		Gimp-Print 4.2.  In Gimp-Print 4.2, setting brightness
		greater than 1 caused black to print as gray, while
		setting brightness to less than 1 caused white to
		print as gray.  In Gutenprint 5.0 this control changes
		the shape of the curve, but the black and white points
		remain the same.


----------------

F) ADVANCED OUTPUT ADJUSTMENTS

    These controls adjust more specialized settings.

        Dither Algorithm

                Since inkjet printers have a limited set of ink colors
                (normally cyan, magenta, yellow, and black), most
                colors have to be produced by mixing the available
                inks.  This is done by printing patterns of very small
                dots, fooling the eye into seeing many different
                shades.  This process is called "dithering"; several
                different patterns are available, with trade-offs
                between speed and quality.  The following dither
                algorithms are currently available.  If no algorithm
                is selected, the driver chooses an appropriate one
                based on other option settings.  The following
                algorithms are currently available, generally in
                increasing order of quality.

                * VERY FAST: This algorithm produces very rough,
                  patterned output, but is extremely fast.  This
                  generally yields poor results on modern inkjet
                  printers, particularly models that offer multiple
                  drop sizes, but it can yield very good results on
                  laser printers.  It is a good choice for printing
                  text or line art where no grayscale or color is
                  used, and also works very well when Threshold color
                  correction is used.

                * FAST: This algorithm also produces output with very
                  strong diagonal patterns, and is also quite fast.
                  It produces somewhat better results on modern inkjet
                  printers that offer multiple drop sizes, but offers
                  no advantages on laser printers or old (generally
                  pre-1999) inkjet printers.

                * ORDERED: This algorithm produces much smoother
                  output than Fast or Very Fast.  It is somewhat
                  slower than those algorithms.  It utilizes a fixed
                  pattern that is generally free of artifacts, but it
                  has some noise (roughness of texture) that may be
                  objectionable with smooth-toned images.  It is an
                  excellent choice for printing draft copies of
                  business graphics or photographs (charts, etc.) due
                  to its lack of artifacts.

                * ADAPTIVE HYBRID: This algorithm produces slightly
                  smoother output than Ordered dithering, at some cost
                  in performance.  It uses a fixed pattern in
                  highlights to avoid artifacts, and error diffusion
                  at higher densities to reduce noise.  It is an
                  excellent choice for printing business graphics due
                  to its lack of artifacts and smooth texture in
                  darker tones.

                * EVEN TONE: This relatively new algorithm yields
                  excellent smoothness in all tones (light, midtone,
                  and shadow), but is considerably slower than most of
                  the other algorithms.  It is somewhat prone to
                  artifacts, including "tearing", at sharp boundaries.
                  This algorithm is well-suited for printing
                  photographs, but is not as suitable for printing
                  solid-tone graphics.

                * HYBRID EVEN TONE: This algorithm combines Even Tone
                  and Ordered dithering to yield smooth results with
                  fewer artifacts than Even Tone dithering, but is
                  even slower than standard Even Tone.  It uses the
                  fixed pattern of Ordered dithering to break up the
                  artifacts of Even Tone dithering.  The result is not
                  quite as smooth as pure Even Tone, but the reduction
                  of artifacts makes this an excellent choice for
                  photographs or photographs mixed with other
                  graphics.

                * PREDITHERED: This is used in combination with
                  dithering performed outside of Gutenprint or with
                  printers that perform their own dithering.  It
                  assumes that the output is already dithered and
                  generates the appropriate drops based only on the
                  values provided.

        Linear Contrast Adjustment

                The standard contrast control does not adjust the
                black and white points of the output; black in the
                input becomes black in the output, for example.  The
                result is that if contrast is reduced below 1, the
                contrast in the highlights and shadows is actually
                increased to keep the same total tonal range.

                Gimp-Print 4.2 used a different kind of contrast
                control.  In Gimp-Print 4.2, reducing the contrast
                reduced the contrast throughout the tonal range,
                resulting in white being printed as a light gray and
                black as a dark gray (reducing the contrast all the
                way to zero resulted in a uniform gray).  If contrast
                was increased, the contrast was stretched until the
                output reached either black or white; anything lighter
                always printed as white and anything darker as black.

                Turning this control on selects the old Gimp-Print 4.2
                behavior.  This control is normally turned off.


----------------

G) OUTPUT DENSITY (INK QUANTITY) CONTROLS

    These controls adjust the amount of ink printed on the page.
    These controls may be used to darken a solid, pure black, or
    eliminate puddling (wet ink left on the paper that does not dry in
    the printer) if needed.  They may also be useful for adjusting the
    behavior of non-standard inks.  They should not be used to lighten
    or darken the print if the black level is correct.

    These controls are adjustments -- they adjust the amount of ink
    relative to the amount selected by the driver for the paper and
    resolution chosen.

        Density Value

                This control adjusts the total amount of ink used in
                all channels (ink colors).

        Black Density Value
        Blue Density Value
        Cyan Density Value
        Magenta Density Value
        Yellow Density Value
        Red Density Value

                These controls adjust the amount of ink used by each
                channel separately.  They may be used to correct the
                amount of ink if needed to strengthen or weaken
                particular colors (e. g. if yellow is too strong or
                too weak).  They should not be used to correct gray
                balance (to produce neutral gray) -- the gray balance
                controls described below should be used for that
                purpose.

		These options are new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Ink Limit Value

                This control adjusts the maximum amount of ink that
                the driver will use to print with.  This may be used
                if you want to use large amounts of particular inks to
                achieve saturated dark colors, without using excessive
                ink overall that will result in ink puddling or
                spilling within the printer.  This control should be
                used only by people very experienced in inkjet
                printing.

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0.


----------------

H) GRAY BALANCE CONTROLS

    These controls adjust the gray balance by changing the amount of
    each color of ink used to produce gray.  For example, if gray
    prints somewhat greenish, it can be corrected by increasing the
    magenta balance.  These options are new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Magenta Balance Value
        Yellow Balance Value
        Cyan Balance Value


----------------

I) OUTPUT GAMMA CONTROLS

    These controls permit adjusting the gamma (exponent) of the
    transfer curves of the individual channels.  On most printers,
    using a linear ink scale (that is, the amount of ink is directly
    proportional to the input value) will produce very dark
    highlights, as even quite small amounts of ink produce very strong
    colors or gray.  Therefore, the driver uses less ink to produce
    lighter colors.  This does not affect the darkest tones.

    Setting these controls to larger values results in lighter
    highlights and midtones and increase contrast in the dark tones,
    while lower values result in darker midtones and highlights with
    reduced dark tone contrast.  These controls are adjustments --
    they adjust the gamma relative to the gamma chosen by the driver
    by multiplying them together.  For example, if the driver uses a
    gamma value of 2.0 for a particular printer, and you specify a
    gamma of 0.75, the actual gamma used to print will be 1.5.

        Composite Gamma Value

                This control adjusts the gamma of all available ink
                channels when printing in color.

		This option is equivalent to the Gamma option in
		Gimp-Print 4.2.

        Black Gamma Value

                This control adjusts the gamma of the black channel
                when printing in grayscale.

		This option is new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Cyan Gamma Value
        Magenta Gamma Value
        Yellow Gamma Value

                These controls adjust the gamma of individual channels
                when printing on printers that use cyan, magenta, and
                yellow inks (all inkjet printers use CMY inks).  These
                gamma values are multiplied by the composite gamma
                value and the gamma chosen by the driver.

                Note that the black gamma value is not used when
                printing in color.  That is because the amount of gray
                is computed after the gamma transformation has been
                applied to each channel, and the black channel is
                synthesized from this value.  The GCR Transition Value
                serves as a gamma value for the black channel.  In
                addition, there are no gamma values for the special
                channels for printers that offer additional inks (such
                as red and blue) for similar reasons.

		These controls are equivalent to the Cyan, Magenta,
		and Yellow controls in Gimp-Print 4.2.

        Red Gamma Value
        Green Gamma Value
        Blue Gamma Value

                These controls adjust the gamma of individual channels
                when printing on printers that use red, green, and
                blue inks (Postscript printers and many dye
                sublimation printers use red, green, and blue colors).
                These gamma values are multiplied by the composite
                gamma value and the gamma chosen by the driver.

		These options are new to Gutenprint 5.0; Gimp-Print
		4.2 referred to them as Cyan, Magenta, and Yellow even
		if the output was RGB.


----------------

J) GRAY GENERATION CONTROLS

    These controls adjust the conversion of gray into black ink and
    composite (CMY) components.  When printing in color, light grays
    are often printed using composite inks rather than black ink to
    reduce the speckling effect of dark black dots, while dark grays
    and black are usually printed using black ink to achieve a darker
    black.  With some ink and paper combinations it is necessary to
    use a mixture of black and composite components to achieve maximum
    density and in some cases to achieve neutral grays (some pigment
    black inks are actually brown).

    The effect of using too much or too little black ink varies.
    Typically if too much black ink is used light colors and grays
    will have noticeable speckling from the black drops, while if too
    little black ink is used the midtones and dark tones will be
    washed out and in some cases too much ink will be used leading to
    puddles on the page.  In some cases very large amounts of
    composite ink cause color shifts (darker grays are not neutral).
    Epson Premium Glossy Photo Paper seems to be particularly prone to
    this problem, particularly with dye inks.

    In general, lower-quality papers require more black ink (composite
    inks generally cannot create very dark tones), while higher
    quality papers require less black ink (the composite inks can
    create much darker grays, and the black dots appear much sharper).

    Setting these controls effectively requires a good understanding
    of gray generation and a fair amount of experimentation.  Normally
    it's only necessary to set the paper type correctly to get good
    results.

    These options are all new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        GCR Lower Bound Value

                This control specifies the darkest shade of gray at
                which no black ink will be used (i. e. any lighter
                gray component will be printed using only composite
                inks).  Setting this control to zero means that some
                amount of black ink will always be used; setting it to
                1 means that no black ink will ever be used.

        GCR Upper Bound Value

                This control specifies the lightest shade of gray at
                which no composite CMY ink will be used (i. e. this
                level of gray and higher will be printed using only
                black ink).  This control should never be set any
                lower than the GCR Lower Bound Value.  Setting this
                control to zero means that only black ink is used to
                print any gray value; setting this control to a value
                greater than one means that some composite ink will be
                used even when printing black.  The upper limit for
                this control is 5 (in which case black will be printed
                with no more than 20% black ink).

                If you use an ink set requiring use of color inks to
                produce neutral grayscale, you should set the GCR
                Lower Bound Value to zero or a value very close to
                zero and the GCR Upper Bound Value should be greater
                than 1, along with a GCR Transition Value (below) of
                1.  This will ensure that the proportion of black and
                color inks will be close to constant throughout the
                gray range.  With this kind of inkset, it's often
                possible to produce cool or warm toned grayscale
                prints by selecting Desaturated color correction and
                adjusting the GCR Upper Bound Value appropriately.
                For example, if the black ink has a brown (warm) cast,
                increasing the GCR Upper Bound Value will yield a
                cooler tone (less black ink) while decreasing it will
                yield a warmer tone (more black ink).

        GCR Transition Value

                This control specifies the gamma of the GCR transition
                curve.  Setting this control to a smaller value
                results in less black ink being used in the lighter
                portion of the transition region.  This control is
                useful if the black ink is much darker than the
                composite inks in order to produce a smoother
                transition.

        GCR Curve

                This control (only available through the Print plugin
                for the GIMP or other Gutenprint-based applications
                that provide curve capability) allows you to specify
                the conversion curve from gray to black/composite
                precisely.  The horizontal axis of this curve
                represents the gray level (between 0, or no gray at
                all, and 1, or pure black); the vertical axis
                represents the fraction of gray that is converted to
                black (0 means only composite inks, and 1 means only
                black ink).


----------------

K) OUTPUT LINEARIZATION CURVES (GIMP Plugin Only)

    These controls permit adjusting the transfer (linearization)
    curves of each channel precisely.  They are only available through
    the Print plugin for the GIMP or other Gutenprint-based
    applications that provide curve capability.  All of these controls
    are considered to be for very advanced use only.  These options
    are all new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Black Curve
        Blue Curve
        Cyan Curve
        Magenta Curve
        Yellow Curve
        Red Curve
        Green Curve


----------------

L) DETAILED COLOR CORRECTION CURVES (GIMP Plugin Only)

    These controls permit adjusting precise characteristics of color
    generation/correction.  They are only available through the Print
    plugin for the GIMP or other Gutenprint-based applications that
    provide curve capability.  All of these controls are considered to
    be for very advanced use only.

    The horizontal axis of all of these curves represents the hue of
    the output.  Hue is measured as an angle, where 0 and 360 degrees
    represent cyan (or red, if the output inks are RGB).
    Conventionally, these angles are represented as a number between 0
    and 6 (each full number in this scale represents 60 degrees).  The
    specific hue angles for CMY and RGB outputs are as follows:

             \                  Ink Type
        Angle \         RGB             CMY
        -----  \        ---             ---
           0    |       Red             Cyan
           1    |       Yellow          Blue
           2    |       Green           Magenta
           3    |       Cyan            Red
           4    |       Blue            Yellow
           5    |       Magenta         Green             
           6    |       Red             Cyan

    These options are all new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Hue Adjustment Curve
        Luminosity Adjustment Curve
        Saturation Adjustment Curve

                These controls adjust the color correction in High
                Accuracy, Bright Colors, and Correct Hue Only color
                correction modes.  These color correction modes work
                by adjusting the hue, saturation, and luminosity (HSL)
                of the output inks to achieve a more accurate color
                than the color created by simply converting the red,
                green, and blue inputs to cyan, magenta, and yellow
                (or red, green, and blue) inks.  Note that in this
                printing context luminosity represents darkness
                (amount of light subtracted) rather than brightness.

                The saturation and hue adjustments are first applied.
                The luminosity correction operates on only the color
                component of the output.  Before this correction is
                applied, any gray value is removed, and added back
                after the correction is completed.

                The vertical axis of the Hue Adjustment Curve
                represents an angular difference that is added to the
                base hue value to generate the desired output.  For
                example, if the blue output is purple (too close to
                magenta), adding a negative value to that range of the
                output will bring the blue value more toward cyan
                (less magenta).
                
                The vertical axis of the Saturation Adjustment Curve
                represents an amount by which the saturation is
                multiplied.  At any given hue point it may take on any
                value between 0 (eliminate all color saturation, which
                is equivalent to converting to pure gray) and 4
                (dramatically boost the saturation).  Therefore, this
                adjustment may be used to tone down excessively
                brilliant colors (e. g. if the reds are overly
                brilliant) or brighten up dull colors (e. g. if the
                greens are somewhat dull).  This control has no effect
                if Correct Hue Only is used.  If the saturation value
                is greater than 1, the effect differs depending upon
                whether High Accuracy or Bright Colors mode is
                selected: if Bright Colors is selected, the saturation
                is simply multiplied by the desired value and then set
                to 1 if it would exceed unity.  If High Accuracy mode
                is selected, the amount of saturation boost is
                decreased if the starting saturation is high.

                The vertical axis of the Luminosity Adjustment Curve
                represents an amount by which the luminosity is
                multiplied.  At any given hue point it may take on any
                value between 0 (remove the color component
                altogether) and 1 (leave it as is).  Therefore, the
                function of the Luminosity Adjustment Curve is to
                lighten excessively dark colors rather than to darken
                light colors.  This control has no effect if Correct
                Hue Only mode is used.

        Blue Map
        Cyan Map
        Magenta Map
        Yellow Map
        Red Map

                These curves control how the auxiliary red and blue
                inks are used on the Epson Stylus Photo R800, Stylus
                Photo R1800, and PictureMate family of printers.
                These printers use auxiliary inks to achieve more
                brilliance in the red and blue.  Other printers in the
                future may use other auxiliary channels, which will be
                made available in similar fashion.

                The vertical axis of each of these controls specifies
                the amount of each ink that should be used to print
                colors of that hue.  These curves are used only to
                generate color; any gray component is removed prior to
                the color generation and added back later.  For
                example, it is possible to specify that a certain
                shade of purple is printed using .2 red ink, .6
                magenta ink, and .5 blue ink (hypothetically).


----------------

M) SPECIALIZED OUTPUT CONTROLS

    These controls are used to modify the output in very
    printer-specific ways.  These options are all new to Gutenprint
    5.0.

        Gloss Level Value

                This control is provided on printers such as the Epson
                Stylus Photo R800 and R1800 that offer a special gloss
                enhancer to produce an even degree of gloss on glossy
                papers regardless of the amount of ink used.  On
                certain glossy papers, areas with high ink coverage
                are a lot glossier than areas with little ink coverage
                (highlights); the gloss enhancer is basically a
                transparent ink that increases the gloss of these
                areas.  This control specifies the desired total
                amount of ink to be printed, including both the normal
                color and black inks and the gloss enhancer.  If the
                amount of normal inks is less than this amount, gloss
                enhancer is used to increase the total amount of ink
                used.


----------------

N) TRANSITION CONTROLS

    These controls adjust the level at which light inks (such as the
    light cyan and magenta inks used on many "photo printers") are
    used in place of the dark inks.  The light inks are used to
    produce a smoother texture (less speckling); the light cyan
    droplets, for example, are individually much less visible than the
    normal dark cyan droplets.

    The ink substitution works by replacing a certain amount of ink by
    a mixture of the light and dark inks.  For example, the dark cyan
    ink may be about 3 times as dark as the light cyan ink, so in
    light areas the cyan may be replaced by 3 times as much light
    cyan.  However, this only works up to a certain point; beyond that
    point, adding more light ink does not significantly increase the
    darkness of the ink.  These transition values adjust the limits at
    which the ink substitution is done; the lower these limits are
    set, the lighter the output at which dark ink is introduced.
    Setting these values lower will generally yield more accurate
    midtone colors at the expense of more speckling in the light
    midtones and highlights.  Generally these values need to be lower
    on low-quality paper than on high quality glossy paper.

    These options are all new to Gutenprint 5.0.

        Dark Yellow Transition Value
        Light Gray Transition Value
        Mid Gray Transition Value
        Dark Gray Transition Value
        Gray Transition Value
        Light Cyan Transition Value
        Light Magenta Transition Value
        Light Yellow Transition Value


----------------

O) FOOMATIC-ONLY OPTIONS

    This control is available only when using the Foomatic interface.
    It provides a collection of presets appropriate for various
    printing tasks.  It is similar in concept to (and provided the
    inspiration for) the Print Quality and Image Type options provided
    in Gutenprint.

        Printout Mode
